early 2006 a probable date
If you are going to post something that has a link to the original author, why not just post the original instead of someone's copy?
Microsoft hates it's own products?  Who knew?
this looks interesting, but it's already aired, and it's not like there's streaming video, so what's the point?
I have nothing but good things to say about Dell Tech Support. Many a time I've called in a faulty part and had the replacement at the front door in two days with a box to ship the old one back. First class service if you ask me.
And by "Microsoft" you mean 4 employees out of 60,000 or so...
This is exactly the same behavior as the very early lisp dialects: they had dynamic scoping in the interpreter and lexical scoping in the interpreter.  I wonder if they knew about the history, or not?
Because this one is different and I like it better.  Here's your sign.
ok
I'm looking forward to the reaction from the ID crowd if this succeeds.
I hope not. I'm not politically motivated, but it annoys me that the world seems less safe now than it did 5 years ago. We have not helped anything by the way we have behaved and have created enemies with people who previously didn't sway strongly either way
The opinionnaire doesn't appear to ask you to write your name on it, and as talking points or thinking points they are quite good, but English does seem an odd choice of class.
awesome.
But Caucho means that a 0.0.1-step update breaks all your code and you can't see anything about the changes in the Changelog. Much fun! 
If money isn't making anyone happy I will gladly accept your money in my paypal account.
Great fonts
My interpretation of the article was more that the singleton pattern is used as a crutch by many programmers to be able to claim that they "understand" object oriented programming and design patterns. This is something I have seen many times myself when interviewing people, and also in a lot of code where the singleton pattern is, as the article describes, very often used in places where it is completely unnecessary. It's not that the singleton pattern is stupid per se, but that it has become the most obvious symbol of how people misunderstand and misuse design patterns in general.
Lush could be wonderful, but it's not. I used it for an actual application several months ago. It is almost completely undocumented. I was very sad when I found this out; it really has a lot of potential.
Some points are interesting, others are definitely nonsense.  In the end, I don't think it's worth reading.
typical stupid, vapid "end of the year, no news to report"  story.  i wish there was a tag for these things that i could assiduously avoid. zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz 
must read
now that was funny.
superficial and it crashed my browser.
This seems to be of limited use. I would want to search the description/comments/documentation of the source, not the source itself.
Amartya Sen's [Development as Freedom](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0385720270/qid=1136132459/sr=8-1/ref=pd_bbs_1/102-5529811-0612100?n=507846&amp;s=books&amp;v=glance) takes this idea and applies it to developing countries. Great book.
On the surface, this looks like good design. There's some interesting animation, good use of colour, and so on. Dig deeper, and it's way off. It's wasteful, incompatible (Flash), and ignorant of its web context. This is a cute interface for a stand-alone product, but on the web it's just poor design.
When you work at home it's important to set boundaries for other people (and creatures). You should probably have a door that closes, and you definitely need the will to use it. I agree that others may be more likely to make demands on the home-worker's time, but it's up to the home-worker to train them.  The examples in the article are lame, because it seems like the home-workers haven't done this. What's with the guy driving his neighbour to the airport? He should ask her for her work number. On a random day the next week, he should phone her at work, and ask her to pick him up some groceries. Click. Understanding.
Another great hack for getting around the magnetic force field (and this is one of those "tricking yourself" hacks) is to tell yourself, "ok, i'm going to work on this for 15 minutes.  I can do ANYTHING for 15 minutes."  Gather what you need, set a timer for 15 minutes, and begin.  Chances are, when the timer goes off you'll have overcome the force field, engaged with the project, and be ready to keep working.   If not, schedule another 15 minute session for later--another way of breaking down the task.
Well done, Paul. I have been reading your stuff for about a year and totally enjoy it. You really have a knack for identifying the heart of the issue and are skilled at finding good analogies for explaining it all. Thanks for the inspiration. - john
I like it, and have rewritten it to [use Dojo](http://www.alper.nl/blog/tech/72).
All of them are good points except 7,8,9 which are filler of a sort.
Calling this a synthetic life form is a reach. They're just manipulating genetics, but using scary new tech instead of breeding.
Such a quaint mythology.
wouldn't a better name for the article have been "Programmers considered stupid" instead then? I have no idea what kind of people he's trying to attract to work for Amazon, perhaps it's dumb programmers who acknowledge that they're dumb and don't use powerful tools because of it.  C++ and Singleton are elegant and powerful when used well: anyone worth hiring will rightly get pissed off by this essay.
Wow, there's a lot of cool stuff linked from that page.  Heavy on the CSS, though. 
It's common sense, dickhead.  Also, do you see ANY rules anywhere?  Does that mean there are none?
Perhaps you should read the article, or take a logic class.  There is no explanation.  There's the statement   &gt; Russians, on the other hand, do everything to stay sober while drinking as much alcohol as possible. Then, it goes on to say how they do it.  My question stands.
There are alcoholic drinks that are good tasting.  There are certain wines that I'd drink more of if they had 0% alcohol.
Everything written in this article is true, and then some.  Note that it mostly applies to those with wives and children. The key to effectively working at home seems to be a combination of two things: a highly disciplined worker, and an isolated, usable work area. I think the latter is the most important and even applies to the office.  If you can't work for sensible periods of time without interruptions, your effectiveness drops to nil. 
"Similarly, movies take forever to download and come out looking pretty shite for the most part." Actually, they generally look fantastic, and take only about one night to download. At least that's what my ... friend ... tells me.
Looks like the author buys into Web 2.0. Also, sIFR belongs on the list of "Websites I Hope To God Everyone Ignored in 2005". see http://aasted.org/adblock/viewtopic.php?t=1687
The reason the music industry is loosing money is because they focus to much on disposable music. They find the front men (or women)to sing, get some music made by people who know only how to make music that is the sound of the "moment". Everyone knows their role, band member just do what their told to. Then this shit gets heavily marketed and people buy it, but buying audience is small and this stuff only gets brought while it is in fashion.  Compare that to music that gets to where it is through talent and passion. When I hear a marketed band singer singing about, say loss, It just can't reach me because it's not true and is sung without meaning. Compared that to a real band where it's the singers real experience. Music like this can continue to sell for decades and by all generations. If the music industry want there sales to go up they should go to the clubs and do talent spotting like they used to and not by people who think what will sell but who think what sounds good and more to the point what *feels* good.
Good god! We're running out of money, so the Bush administrations suggests that we... raise the debt limit!!! Incidentally, this article isn't available on the US edition of Yahoo! News. Only on international versions. That's interesting.
This is a bad idea, why traslate word by word rather than evaluating expressions?
*sniff*  My old web server is finally going away.
Very wise.... And offcourse it's good thing to use humengous amount of money to war :P
I found this quite moving.  Thankfully, it seems that in 1996, he had found a girlfriend: From http://www.pacificnews.org/marko/961001-kevorkian.html  "I live in a pleasant new apartment in Berkeley, California  ... I have tons of books, an alarming collection of cassettes and CD's, a girlfriend."
Thanks for that link  - had never heard of Richard Hamming but what he says in amazingly interesting (actually so is the Paul Graham site). Thanks
25 web sites you shouldn't have missed if you're a web designer -- but not everybody is a web designer so ...
database seems to have broken...
This happens quite often, actually.  The statutory debt limit is just an artificial ceiling imposed by Congress, which only gives allows the treasury to take on a certain amount of debt.  But rather than restrict spending to stay below the debt limit, Congress just raises the debt ceiling when needed.  Congress has raised it in 2002, 2003 and 2004.  See http://www.the-privateer.com/usdebt/usdebt.html and http://www.antiwar.com/paul/?articleid=4015 for more info.
I read every single post on Polyphasic sleeping and thought it was very interesting... I don't see there being any issue this being up the top in reddit.
Google Search Quality Engineer, goes into details with Examples of Websites BANNED because of getting caught using Stategies that are disapproved of by Google. The outspoken, learned Readers Chime in to make this one of the most memorable posts for any Webmaster to bookmark for future reference.
Not only that, but they better have damn fast load time!  I like having the option of opening a image in it's own window, then I don't have to wait for the original page to reload, I can just click the image closed. Most websites load kind of slow as it is, and I have little patience for gimmicky crap that does nothing but waste time.
Has Bush actually done anything positive?  What's so wonderful about living in a police state?  There was a study a couple months ago saying that the average citizen is 360 times more likely to die in an auto accident than killed by a terrorist.  Should we have a War on Cars?  Quit letting FEAR shortcut your ability to reason.
Because murder happens frequently, murder is okay.  
Life is so much easier when you can look at things in black and white, isn't it? This is evil, and this isn't. End of story. Makes you wonder why people invest so much effort into that silly thing called "thinking".
Too bad the people who should read it don't read it. 
Good to know, thanks rsheridan!  However, our elected officals do have a record of deliberately misleading the public on occasion, so . . .
Not sure what is meant by "marked down".  I was wondering if this story was going to be noticed, glad someone posted it.  What's wrong with being a conspiracy nut?  The gullible never realize they've been robbed, because they think no one would ever do such a thing.
This blog entry makes some very good points.  
I'm not a web designer, but I have a website.  I've already used some of the ideas there to spiff it up. 
So why do people insist on making the situation worse by having 2+ kids?  Because the Flying Spagetti Monster told them to be fruitful and multiply!  Where exactly does it say in the bible to leave your brain at the door?
Just look at these Photos, sometimes a picture tells so much about someone's potential, in their unguarded youth. Can you see how these individuals would become so successful in life - look closely at their eyes and their smiles.
Open the PDF, then follow along with the MP3.
Yep, it's prostitution.  A victimless crime if ever there was one.  Jesus was able to forgive them, you should too. Yes, it's a touching story because of his disabilities, and yes, if it was about somebody with other problems it would probably be just as touching (and not just in the literal sense). Btw, if you _really_ "don't want to hear those intimate details", then why did you click the link? Perhaps, the next story will be about your experience with a prostitute, and how it opened your eyes, and your heart. I look forward to it.
Good article, nice pictures. Misleading title, though. I expected it to go more in depth about the pre-80's Microsoft.
Yes, but it's BENEVOLENT prostitution.
British oncologists have developed a revolutionary prototype for a dust-speck sized device that can detect cancer in seconds.
AquaMinds is developing a breakthrough collaboration tool - allowing (as of now) up to 36 people the ability to simultaneously view and edit a text document.
The accountants, pharmacists, and engineers tell me the economy is just fine.  The massage therapists, store clerks, and delivery folks tell me they're starting to worry how many extra part-time jobs it'll take to keep food on the table.
misses the main thing JS was saying, which is that education in harder concepts make it easier to tell whether someone is bright. 
I think that people who work at home have more control over their environment.  Like HiggsBoson says, you need to train the people sharing the same house as you.  Have you tried doing that to your boss or co-workers at work? It won't work unless you can fire them. Still I would rather be interrupted by my child than my boss coming in every 5 minutes to share his next idiot idea.  You can also control the noise level around you.  At the office I share the floor with 50 loud people and ringing phones.  I'd much rather be at home listening to my stereo. Another thing I would like (yes I don't work from home yet), is the ability to manage my own time.  If I have something important to do, no problem, work 16 hours as long as I get paid to do so.  But if I can't do anything because I'm waiting for others, I'd rather be able to go and do my laundry than sit around twiddling thumbs while others take smoke breaks and waste away time.
The surrogate was married, too.  You forgot 'adultery'.  He probably didn't honor his mother and father, either.   Tool.   (Hey, people modding me down, I am not defending the original poster ... it's called irony ...)
WWJD?
Yeah, one of my favourite sites on the web.  Just brilliant
With all the discussion on lisp and the parallel to java.  I say introduce them both in the same application.  Here is an application on using ABCL and the standard java libraries. I could also suggest using jython.
I thought this article was complete rubbish.  I didn't get the feeling the guy knows the first thing about programming, and he only provided extremely vague refutations of what Paul Graham had to say.  Nothing concrete, nothing specific. The main point the author focuses on is the superficial differences between painting and programming (one of them is manipulating electronic bits and the other is putting oil on a canvas with a stick and animal hair).  From that he concludes the two things are totally and utterly different from each other. Clearly this guy is not a real programmer, or probably even a good programmer for that matter.  I am sure that many, or even most programmers are not artists, but that isn't who Paul Graham writes about.  He writes about the great programmers, the ones who write code that reads like poetry, or unfolds like great art.  There are also plenty of programmers who can make you cry just by looking at their code, but that's a different kind of programmer entirely. Personally I thought this article was stupid and filled with the kind of nonsence that he accused Paul Graham of perpetrating.  He complains that Paul Graham, Eric Raymond, and Dave Winer write about things they see in themselves and call that greatness.  Apparently this author writes about the shortcomings and failures he projects from himself onto other people.  Moron.
I guess that you missed his main points. True, "Java Kids" can do all kinds of things.  However, learning "pointers" and "recursion" makes one a *better*, *much better*, programmer.  Without looking into C/pointer and Lisp/recursion, "Java-only kids" do not know what they have missed.  That's the point! It's a pitty that many people don't get it. 
An amusingly ironic response. When the ACLU stands up for something you disagree with, they're showing their true colors -- but when they stand up for something you agree with, those are just cleverly designed PR events to further the conspiracy. But I'm the one being gullible. 
You know what? I could sit here and argue with you, but it would be a bad investment of my time. Here's what I'm going to do instead: I'm going to remind you that every word in that article was typed using a freaking *mouthstick* by a man who cannot move anything below his neck. So who the *fuck* cares if he paid money for sex? Moreover, you do see things in black and white, and just because you say you don't doesn't mean it's true. It's all talk, no walk. The only argument you have against prostitution is STDs, which obviously doesn't apply in this case. Thus you have NO logical argument against prostitution in this case, thus your objection stems from black-and-white, binary, low-level thinking, and thus, in conclusion, therefore, ergo, accordingly, _you are a wanker_. Good day!
You really should! It's a lot of fun.
Oh...right...like the time he raised a man who had been dead for 3 days? Come on...you may have your theories, but this article tries to say, "Jesus w as almost certainly a cannabis user and an early proponent of the medicinal properties of the drug, according to a study of scriptural texts published this month." If you actually studied the scriptural texts, I have no clue how you come up with these theories even if you look at it from a secular point of view. Again, I don't care how much your drench a dead body with cannabis, it sure as hell ain't coming back to life. Either the stories are made up or they are real. An explanation like "cannabis" really doesn't cut it. As a matter of fact, the only reference of annointing oils in the New Testament was when a prostitute put them on Christ's feet. Many of the instances of healing in the NT were spontaneous and mention nothing about any oils. For example, a woman who has a menstrual problem touches Christ and is healed. Christ turns around and asks who touched him because "I felt power go out from me". There is no mention that Christ turned around and put oils on the woman. She was the one who touched him. I imagine this will get promoted purely due to how much people like to read controversial stuff, no matter how far it is from the truth. I wish the 'scholars' involved in this study did a better job of reading the texts.
after the Sony rootkit, and now seeing this, I am NEVER buying music again, at least in CD form.
Like what?
&gt; A victimless crime if ever there was one There's plenty of victims. The actual prostitue is often a victim. Then the spouse of the client.. etc
If you hold shift down while you insert these CDs into Windows then autoplay doesn't run, the "protection" software doesn't run, and the computer sees the disc as a normal audio CD which you can do whatever you want with. Note that you should hold shift down for a good few seconds after you insert the CD, say 30 seconds.
I make my stand by not buying CDs that are marked "Copy Protected".
The power of blogs.
Not a bad article. There is some business-school garbage in the final two paragraphs, but otherwise interesting. The IBM/MS relationship is confusing but not interesting enough to  figure out.
Would I want one of these photos hanging in my office? No. Do I take any aesthetic pleasure in looking at these pictures? No. Am I impressed by the artist's talent? Yes.  Am I fascinated by diners and ketchup bottles? No.
I never realized what a good speaker he once was.  I possibly would have considered him to be a viable choice for my vote if he had expressed his ideas so clearly.
if i didn't hate their music so much i'd hop on soulseek and pirate some of their (shitty) music right now, just to spite them.
nothing new.Just adds some more details but more or less regular stuff.Also it seems like this article was written in 1993.  What about Netscape/IE battle?
You could also pay someone, like a cleaner, or gardener.
Another great article from the team at Polosbastards. Keep em coming........ ;-))
It seems that Mr. Goings has spent the last 30 years of his life at eating donuts and staring at table settings at his local greasy spoon.  The pictures give me a feeling of bleak loneliness. Besides, if you're going to spend 30 years copying photographs with a paintbrush, couldn't you at least learn to take better photographs?
The author's paintings are very beautiful.  Paul Graham's Lisp books are great.  But just because artists and scientists create things does not mean that art is like science which is the author's point. Good programmers are computer scientists so I would argue that programming is (or most likely should be) science. Emotions are to art what logic is to science. Emotions and logic contradict big time. What I have written here has nothing to do with art because it is all logical.
Joel Spolsky bores me. Pleased to find that someone else agrees. I find his stuff crap a lot of the time and frankly his company and software isn't that great.
No, because he's not saying programmers are stupid, or even that programmers that use the singleton are stupid. He's saying that there are a substantial number of programmers who think they know good object oriented design practice just because they know what the singleton pattern is, even though they often don't understand when it should be used, and more importantly when it should NOT be used. I completely agree that the singleton pattern is elegant and powerful when used well, but the cases where it is used well are rare in comparison to the number of people who use it blindly without really understanding the underlying concepts.
well, I personally would like a feature on Reddit where if "Joel Spolsky" is mentioned in any article that I just don't see it. The guy bores me so so much.
I got the impression that painting is nothing like hacking because one gets you laid and the other doesn't.  Now let's hear it from Paul Graham.  Are you just gonna sit there and take that?
I get the feeling that a lot of people who diss JS have never seen the field from the side of hiring people, with tight budgets -- aka the real world. As an employer, you have significant challenges in getting the people you want, especially if you're a small company. Big companies can get whoever they want, by simple virtue of the Law of Big Numbers. When you can't afford to make a "mistake" upon hiring, you want to be able to find that ideal candidate. For a startup, which is where JS' experience derives, what you're working on is probably so far left-field that whatever "practical" experience your candidate has, they're going to need to learn a crap-load at your place before they're useful. For that particular situation, the thing you want above all else is the ability to learn, which a good working knowledge of things like pointers and CS theory is a good indicator of. Again, this is all predicated on small firm, doing something unusual.
It is said that a good mathematician sees analogies between things. A great mathematician sees analogies between analogies. There is something creative and imaginative which is the mark of all that is great in their trade. The guy's point of view of painting is so low that he concludes that Picasso was worrying about the same things as he is?
like the point about assembly language (just one example). 
education in hard concepts is not as important as education in relevant concepts.
Argh..  killed my last comment accidentally. As a practicing engineer, I find the knowledge gained when I used log tables (in high school) of great importance.  I use approximations based on logs very often in my work.    Do they teach the use of log tables anymore?  If not, then should I complain about the calculator kids who can't understand it when I say the signal is 3dB lower, or don't understand the concept of the log-amp?   
Drinking has a way of catching up to you, I suppose...
It is possible that the thrust of Paul Graham's argument was not that hackers are like painters in any literal sense, but that it is inaccurate to look at programmers as engineers(in the blueprints and slide-rule sense).  Painting is merely a handy analogy. The fact that Graham is interested in painting(not entirely untalented as well), and knows something of its history (maybe not everything) certainly gives him enough authority to say 'hey, these things are not so different.' I have no problem believing that there is overlap between Paul Graham's painting-mode and Paul Graham's hacking-mode, and am glad for the insights he offers regarding the creative process in general. It can be a bit annoying when people from the 'hard' sciences start talking about the Art of their practice. In my experience, this usually results from a confusion between beauty/elegance and Art at large. The last 150 years have served as a pretty strong argument that beauty != Art, and its no wonder that some people would find it difficult to consider merge-sort (or even viaweb) in the same light as Guernica. However, by the same token, artists have a habit of intentionally mysticizing their work. Judging from the superficial beauty and elegance of the author's work I would say his process, all bohemian orgies aside, has a lot more in common with engineering than he would like to admit.
And by "talent", you mean "extraordinary amounts of free time", they sure... There is somethign fascinating about photorealism, but is there really nothing better to spend your time on?
This guy is whining because no one reads his blog. Boo hoo. I'll try to help that trend continue.   -1 
Great blog article. Funny and true.
...or you could just disable autorun permanently...or just not buy copy-protected CDs at all which is probably much better.
We're programmers. Programmers are, in their hearts, architects -- Joel Spolsky I think this is a much more matching analogy.  Being programming a creative activity of course  some analogy exists with painters too, but there is a deep difference  as architects have to be creative under a lot of constraints, from the  gravity force to space. This is also true for programmers, but I think it's  not the same for painters unless they choose to paint in a very specific way. Sometimes it's said that the real creative moment of an architect is  not while he is designing something, but when he builds his own  "architectural system". To design something is then the application  of such a system: still a creative activity, but not the most important  part. It seems like that it's true for programming too. You are  creative when you try to solve a given specific problem with the  tools you have, but your best effort is when you try to build  these tools in a generic way in your head, when you find new systems  to describe problems. As this appears to be (to me at least) not as  true as it is for programming and architecture if applied to painting, this  is somewhat a (not very objective maybe) proof that painting and  programming isn't the best match for an analogy.
I really don't understand governments. Why can't they simply work with the money they got and split it between the departments that need money? Sure, that means you can't wage war every few years and make tax-cuts to win the next election...
System Shock 2, PC Transport Tycoon, PC Baldur's Gate 1+2, PC   
You should try it and find out ;)
I think the point was not Java vs Lisp or something like it.It was about how its difficult to test someone's CS concepts using java..For example a whole array of complex and tricky C style string manipulation stuff like strncmp and strcpy cant be asked to someone who thinks java.lang.Utils.String are only way to manipulate strings!
I guess there would be some photograph on the page if any of it was real. But seeing only drawings I think it's just a funny speculation about what _could_ be done.
Yeah, **losing** money. I think the internet will be very important in rectifying the annoying music situation. This is because the internet allows everyone to be involved, it removes barriers to finding new music. I think it will be more and more embraced by artists resulting in an overall rise in the accessibility of quality music. I don't say that it will raise the quality of music, because I believe there is already a whole lot of high quality stuff out there, it just is not being exposed. I think the trend is already starting, it will just gain momentum. As more people realize they can cheaply publish to the web, more will. This results in a huge amount of stuff being available. The great thing about the internet is that quality things always rise to the top through word of mouth.
Jesus did not invent the religion - the religion invented Jesus. Check out http://jesusneverexisted.com/ , for example.
5 and 8 are not entirely true, afaik. 5: "Reduce the number of local variables to make sure each can have it's own register." This was the case a long time ago, but compilers can figure out register dependencies sufficiently that trying to work for this tip is simply going to convolute your code. 8: "Pass anything over 4 bytes by reference." This is usually true but keep in mind that each access to a variable passed by reference will incur a pointer dereference. There is a tradeoff -not a hard and fast rule.
End of Internet predicted, film at 11.
I study at the Delft University of Technology (the netherlands). The whole works is taught here in the CS department: A lot of java, sure, but there's a course on 68k assembler, CaML and prolog are covered, as are the basics of LISP, and C++ is used in a major computer graphics project, with a slew of pointers to boot. And yet 99% of all students who get their degree here can't program worth a damn. Over half is a raving lunatic for their own language (usually C. Suggesting (insert any language here) is the only language you ever need to learn, and that all other languages, by virtue of not being (insert any language here) suck, is obviously a clear sign you don't get it)... and the rest run for cover the moment you dare speak the words 'programming!'. Or, in short: Spolsky's full of it by empirical proof. It's not what you teach, it's how you do it.
Some of these are misguided to say the least, like adjusting structure sizes to powers of two or avoiding local variables.   Besides that they don't mention the most common low level optimisation mistakes people do: not writing cache friendly code and thinking memory allocation is cheap. Also, any article on optimisation that doesn't begin with "Profile first!" shouldn't be trusted ;-)
the best way to optimize any code is to profile, profile, profile, and then *think* about what the profiling data says.  try to find a better data structure, in order to pre-calculate whatever can be, and to minimize data structure traversals. try to memoize variables and expression values, to minimize re-running code and re-evaluating subexpressions. then think about algorithms, in case you can find a more efficient way of doing whatever you're still doing. only after that should you consider cache friendliness and memory locality.
He's not actually that good, too... there are some very good photorealists who can take a photograph of a human and make an identical painting (one has work in The ART Book), but this guy does semi-realistic ketchup bottles instead. His shadows are wrong.
One of the first people to regard copying as theft, eh?
He deleted all his comments. o_O
I've thought about replying to this article.  It's loaded with mistakes.  But merely refuting something mistaken doesn't generally produce an interesting essay.  So the joke would be on me if I spent time on that instead of exploring some genuinely interesting question.  Then instead of merely calling me names this guy would have wasted a week of my life.
I've also compared programmmers to architects, in other essays. There are some ways programmers are more like painters, though: for example, programs, like paintings, are all design, whereas buildings are designed by architects and then handed over to builders to build.  So you see a lot more rapid prototyping and refactoring in hacking and painting than architecture.  An architect has much less ability to change things once construction starts.
if you scroll all the way to the bottom there are other cheatsheets fo javascript, mysql, mod_rewrite, mysql and php.
This shows us how much the web will change writing.  I found it very interesting, but no magazine editor would have printed it.
"Do not declare 'just in case' virtual functions" Oh, boy. Way to make sure that whatever benefits inheritance brings are minimized, in the name of premature optimization. I wonder whether this guy is thinking of destructors as "just-in-case" things. I agree with all other comments regarding profiling.
How true.  Couldn't have reddit anywhere else ;)
When I first came to America, I found the whole doggy-bag culture very unseemly and would never have dared asking to take the "left-over scraps" home. Now (after living a combined 13+ years in Canada and America) would snub my nose at the blatant waste of *not* taking a doggy bag.  I am not sure if this can be attributed to a change in culture, age, or the fact that portions here are so much larger than in Europe... I suspect it has to do with all three with a heavy slant on the latter.
You could ask the waiter to wrap the leftovers up. In restaurants with meal sizes comparable to the US. 
I smell photoshop...
If you read this, remember that he's not talking about Common Lisp or Scheme. For example, the ONCE-ONLY macro is not a standard part of CL, but you can get a version which is similar (and doesn't require the &amp;environment passing) from the cl-utilities library, &lt;http://common-lisp.net/project/cl-utilities/&gt;.
"I am on the watch list too. Or rather the name 'Paul Graham' is." That's 'cause you're a dangerous subversive. We've all been warned about people like you, Paul. The most unusual case I ever heard of is the case of the name "Dave Nelson" being mysteriously red-flagged in the (now-defunct) CAPPS II data-mining system. AFAIK, nobody ever figured out why that was, and even the developers of the system didn't know -- or at least didn't admit to knowing. What I found eerie about it was that "Dave" and "Nelson" (as in Rockefeller) were the nicknames for the WTC Twin Towers.   
He does have a valid point about the sex. http://www.timesonline.co.uk/article/0,,8123-1918944,00.html   
That's exactly what the article addresses though. Most of the comments here are just re-iterating what JS says as if they hadn't read or understood this article which points out the logical fallacy that Joel has fallen into. It says that while Joel is accusing the Java 'kids' of being Blub programmers, Joel himself is a Blub programmer when looked at from a different perspective. It's a variation on the Paul Graham argument as it is saying that you can move the apex of the programming power scale dependent on the requirements and environment of the day. I like Joel's essays and I'm no Java fan but I do find his emphasis on stuff like pointers a bit strange for a company developing web apps. Surely a high-level approach with emphasis on architecture and RAD are more important - it's why we are seeing the rise of frameworks like Rails.  
Very interesting read.
Actually, I think it's more of a light-hearted social commentary.  Read the title.
The photographs contained shiny things, glass, liquids, shadows. For a photorealistic painting the photographs these were based on are just fine.
I wonder what we might have seen from Ralph had he been a **[hacker rather than a painter](http://adnam.twenex.org/rd/hackers-and-painters-paul-graham)**..
A new headset accessory for the iPod projects video played off it on to a screen smaller than a quarter and is mounted in front of one eye.  Its makers say this creates the illusion of watching a 105 inch screen from a distance of 12 feet.
I agree with the article. Pointers and recursion seem to be randomly picked. There are much harder programming concepts like coroutines and continuations. And they *are* useful in the real world for certain tasks, but you can't see that if you don't already understand the concepts. I think the problem with teaching them is the limited real-world examples that are usually demonstrated... I think event-driven programming versus the old console-style UI is a good showcase for coroutines, and continuations can be demonstrated building on coroutines in the context of web development. Has anybody written this tutorial?
I would argue that ability to learn is very similar to the ablity to deal with a novel situation, which can and should be tested on the interview.
I hear Stroustrup is working on Ook++.
22 Finalists - Vote for your favorite of 2005. The photos are almost mesmerizing.
Well, sorry, but for me, CS courses are about making the programmer's life easy -- and *not* about making the life of the recruiter easy.  If I can't tell a bright person from a not-so-bright one, that means I'm just crap at hiring. It does *not* mean universities are crap at teaching. Moreover, in his essay, JS keeps complaining about crappy recruiters "who use grep to evaluate résumés" and hire crappy programmers as a result. This one really bothers me, for two reasons: 1. If hiring crappy programmers is as simple as using grep, then why doesn't Joel just use grep *himself* to sort them out?  2. Hiring brilliant programmers *must* be hard. Orelse everyone will be able to hire them and Joel will lose his competitive advantage. I really think Joel is becoming a bit crotchety (as he himself admits). I remember how back in the 90's everyone complained about how the universities treat CS as abstract *science* and do not teach you jack about actual *programming*, i.e. working for a real company in the real world. Now, as universities start teaching people the stuff they'll most probably need to actually pay they bills, now that they start (or continue?) teaching programming languages that are actually used in the industry, now those *very same* people start telling us how much better the old days were. C'mon, face it, the need for Scheme applications is not exactly rising. Sure, I get your point, learning Scheme or Lisp or SML will make you a better programmer in any language, including Java.  But that's like saying that studying physics will make you a better driver. It surely will, but most pizza-delivering companies simply don't require their drivers to hold a Ph.D. in physics, so *why waste your time* studying physics if you could get the job anyway? Tellya what, understanding the Theory of Relativity will make you an *even better* programmer. But does that mean that anyone who doesn't understand the Theory of Relativity is a crappy programmer? Sigh. My biggest problem with Joel, however, is his whining about  &gt; CS graduates who are simply not smart enough to work   &gt; as programmers on anything more sophisticated than   &gt; Yet Another Java Accounting Application Sorry, Joel, but such arrogance makes me sick. Last time I checked, you were working on nothing more sophisticated than Yet Another ASP Bugtracking Application. Frankly, you are not in a position to dis anyone. Yes, I understand that your bugtracking software is the cat's whiskers, and you certainly need brilliant people to make it work for left-handed avocado farmers with Polish keyboards -- but again, writing accounting software that works for left-handed avocado farmers with Polish keyboards is *just* as hard and requires *just* as brilliant programmers. And again, if hiring brilliant people becomes easy, then you'll have to *compete* against those grep-using recruiters. That will make your life worse, not better.
Here's an interesting explination of the origin of the term Form follows function and how we mostly misuses it.
In any case, you must admit that he was quite an eloquent speaker compared to recent years.  There is no reason to believe that everything a politician says during any public event necessarily coincides with his own beliefs.  The speech is only a tool to convince voters that they are on the same side, and his ability to deliver an intelligible response is noteworthy.
Resell logo design services!
I'd be more impressed with this site if the guy's CSS/javascript (I'm not going to bother checking which one) didn't break my scrollbar.
This is spam.  It's about time reddit had a way for users to mark stuff as spam...
Why is this spam? It was useful for me ...
its a joke obviously. Nobody but a complete  muppet would bid for a piece of a site which   is yesterdays news....would they ?
It's amazing how awful this is. Longhorn will be 100GB?!
lame ...
I don't know if it is fuNNy because I cannot open the link.
Yeah but there were no comments then so it wasn't half as much fun to watch. :) 
You might even say it was an endless *font* of movie fonts
On a more serious note: entomologists practice insect fixation quite often in their labs :-&gt;
Edward Tufte might have been more boisterous than this guy, but said it better, too. If you have to make a PowerPoint presentation, make sure you're conveying real information, and not boiling it down to nothing.
A really nice list of color palette generation and modification tools for web and elsewhere
Not to "defend" Italy at every cost, but here a lot of people work  Saturday. A more informative stat should show the number of  working days for year, or better the number of working hours  for year (If I remember exactly in France many  people work 36 hours).
The tenses are all wrong - all wrong! "Thou shalt not seek" not "Thou shalt not seeketh."
There's a few more than those listed under his "Cheat Sheets" category: http://www.ilovejackdaniels.com/cheat-sheets/
A few Free Good Quality Anti Spyware and Anti Virus Programs - The Overview is geared towards  Newer computer users.
For all those repressed idiots (whos comments seem to have kindly been deleted???) here are two points:  - You think prostitution is evil per se? If this is a religious notion, here is a little fact: Judah (of the Bible) hired what he thought was a prostitute. He is, according to the same Bible, the projenitor of the Kings of Israel (prostitution IS forbidden by Jewish law, but is permitted to non-Jews. Even the Jewish forefathers are treated as non-Jews before Moses delivered the goods)  - You having sex with a disabled person is degrading to a woman and is only done for money? FWY, Bertrand Russell's mother had mercy sex with a disabled person (with his father's consent). I do not think it was done for money.
so good information
Minus the added commentary, anyone believing in God should follow these as well. And as for this comment: /The Ten Commandments have been with us for more than two millennia yet murder, cruelty, thievery, racism, ethnic hatred and religious strife is just as much, if not more, a part of our everyday lives as it ever was./ No matter what we replace them with, we will always find more of the same. Because, we are human.
That's pretty much the idea of athiesm, isn't it?  We, as human beings, must acknowledge and accept the flaws of human nature and should be responsible for our own actions, regardless of the religious culture with which we are presented.
Level: 4, Score: 27 Before I gave up.
Obviously these rules were not inspired by any sort of higher being.
Wired follow up:  http://www.wired.com/news/medtech/0,1286,61091,00.html?tw=wn_tophead_3   
shimomura deserves some hate
I got the first 7 right and last 5 wrong. Hmmm...
I got to level 5, 63 points. Kinda boring.
Though I know that it doesn't belong in the top list or anything, one game that long had a special place in my heart was Drowned God: Conspiracy of the Ages Yes, I know many people don't like it, and that it's very buggy to say the least, but, at least for me, it definately got the atmosphere right. Given that the company (Inscape) imploded a while back, and I don't even know who currently holds the rights for the game, I doubt a sequel will be seen for it, probably would be a very limited market for it even if, but....
Why the hell does it have to be redesigned? Pick a whopping great Zippo and reuse the dang blang thing...
Good article, but it has been posted before... http://www.longnow.org/views/essays/articles/ArtFeynman.php
The Japanese one is obviously counting public holidays (there's almost one a month) as there's no way they get 25 days of annual leave to use a year. More like about 10 days of annual leave.
More than defense, this article needs a reality check.  No one I know here in northern Italy gets that much vacation - my wife's parents both work in "state jobs" and certainly get a lot of vacation, probably a month, all things considered, but not the month and a half that these statistics suggest. And then we come to the other reality: not many people my age (30) have the sorts of jobs that let you get even that month of vacation.  At most, you might get a month of unpaid leave in August when everything shuts down. This is the flip side of Italy's social model: it's very hard to fire people once they are entrenched with full fledged contracts, so employers do what they can to avoid hiring people that way.  The result being is that you get some sort of half-baked position that's neither here nor there, often without some of the benefits like the month of vacation. Something else that's interesting that these stats dont' really show is that a large portion of Italy takes their vacations in the same month - August - when much of northern Italy shuts down.  I view that as being more harmful to productivity than long vacations, because even those who want to work, can't.  And I don't relish the idea of giving up crowded, busy cities to go to crowded, busy, pricey beach towns myself!
I love Feynman stories, he's such a character.
The Brazilian one is quite correct.  If you're a properly registrated employee, you have 30 days of paid vacations per year.  I'm surprised about how short are the US vacations.
Twice. Search on "connection machine". I posted the first article about 2 months ago, and was amused to see it re-posted about a month ago.  So -- is this a problem? How to solve it automagically? What about scanning the posted page title for similarities to previously posted pages. Then warn the new poster that this might be a re-post. That would miss a lot of cases, but it could have found this one.
Informasi beasiswa dalam negeri luar negeri. Beasiswa sekolah s1 s2 s3 &amp; posdoc. Free scholarships for international students.Visit: http://informasi-beasiswa.blogspot.com
Blogger Indonesia reviews on other blogger Indonesia who blogs in English. Indonesia blogs directory and current events commentary. http://afsyuhud.blogspot.com
Islam, Muslim, Quran, Hadith and other Islamic related issues. http://opini-islam.blogspot.com
&gt; i simply refuse to allow my personal morality to be predicated on the promise of "heaven" or the threat of "hell". thats how you prode animals, not humans. That shows a pretty major misunderstanding of Chritianity. My personal morality has nothing to do with the promise or heaven or the threat of hell. It has to do with obeying a living God which is much wiser than myself and has never let me down. I've yet to see a command of Christ that doesn't make sense. It is through my own personal experience that not following the law has only led to hardship for me. It seems to me that many of the commands of the Bible are good for living a better life. I'm glad he had the sense to command me to "love my neighbor  as myself", because that in itself sums up any command you could ever make. I also wasn't aware that animals were prodded with promises of heaven and threats of hell. I mean, when I tell my dog to do something and he won't listen, I don't say, "If you don't do this, you are going to doggie hell!" Infact, I don't know anyone that does that. That's kind of weird. ;) &gt; (a religion as nonsensical as christianity). And please be a bit more tactful with your words. I understand why some people are atheists. But to say that Christianity is "nonsensical" because of some misgivings you may have is pretty hard-headed. I will agree, some Christians live a very nonsensical brand of Christianity, but not all do...the the general assumption that being a Christian means that your brain is somehow disabled irks me quite a bit.
Informasi beasiswa Indonesia dalam negeri luar negeri. Informasi beasiswa Indonesia sekolah S1 s2 s3 dan posdoc. Email informasi.beasiswa-at-gmail-dot-com. Info beasiswa: http://informasi-beasiswa.blogspot.com
You can't beat the classics. How old is this site - 2001? Still crazy after all these years. Jonah Peretti, the guy who did this, rocks. 
-1, mix up real hackers with famous crackers.
There is no doubt that a person can be good or evil (and anything in between) regardless of creed, or lack thereof.  The goal of the athiest is simply to question the basic foundations of religion.  Clearly, the Bible and its various interpretations are full of inconsistencies and it makes no sense to base further assumptions on a source which cannot withstand rigorous analysis in the first place.  If historical context cannot be trusted in determining truth, it must be that a religious belief comes from faith alone.  And if it is faith that gives us this strong attachment, what prevents us from simply choosing a different religion, or a different set of beliefs.  To the athiest, this is exactly the relevation.  Since we are free to believe in whatever we choose, why not believe in ourselves?
One of the point of JS article, IMHO, is that univertsities seem more interested in giving students the knowledge requested from software companies, than teaching the basics like pointers and recursion. In Italy we recently had a reform in universities that goes exactly in this direction: create graduates quickly and with the knowledge requested by the market. These seems to be the only judgement methods for a good university. Having strong basics let a programmer adapt and learn new things easily, and in programming where things change so quickly I find it invaluable. 
as a programmer and business analyst, this is superb - made me laugh out loud.
I'm not from the US, but I've heard that their paid leave includes public holidays. On the other hand I've heard that employers are quite open to taking family days off like attending your kid's football game or stuff like that.
Is it true that Germany has a 30 hour work week?
&gt; Clearly, the Bible and its various interpretations are full of inconsistencies and it makes no sense to base further assumptions on a source which cannot withstand rigorous analysis in the first place. Actually, the only reason I'm a Christian is because I did some serious study on Christianity. I refused to have a blind faith - Christ said to love God "with all your mind, heart and body". Obviously that implies more than just a blind emotional faith. That being said, I've yet to find anyone who can find a true inconstency with the Bible. Every "inconsistentcy" or "contradiction" I've ever seen brought forth against the Bible is either a) not reading the text in context or b) not understanding the audience it was written to. I'd love it if you would show me one. &gt; If historical context cannot be trusted in determining truth, it must be that a religious belief comes from faith alone. And the Bible has shown time and time again that it is an accurate historical record. An example: Sir William Ramsay was a respected archaelogist who lived at the end of the 19th century. He was an atheist who ascribed to the theory that the Book of Acts was a product of made up stories produced in the 3rd century. Using the Bible as source text, he set out around the Mediterranean intend on disproving it.  In the process of trying to show that the Biblical stories were made up, he found that the Bible was a remarkably accurate historical text. He suprised everyone when he returned home and wrote his book *St. Paul the Traveller and Roman Citizen* in which he stated, "Great historians are the rarest of writers...[I regard Luke] among the historians of the first rank". &gt; Since we are free to believe in whatever we choose, why not believe in ourselves? Did Hitler not believe in himself? Did Jeffrey Dahmer not believe in himself? If we have no ultimate authority on what is right or wrong, what business do you have telling the murderer that he is doing wrong? Perhaps he is only doing what he believes right (see Hitler). I think there is a bit of misunderstanding on what exactly faith is. Faith doesn't necessarily imply one without evidence. You place faith/trust in your friends or certain people because they have shown you that they are reliable. Faith is placed on court decisions not because there is absolute proof that something has happened, but rather because the evidence is too great to ignore. The same goes for the Christian. You don't have to put blinders on to believe in God. Infact, God wants you to seek him out and look for the evidence that he is there. It is the only reason I am a Christian - I have seen historically and in my own life time and time again evidences of God. Just like many of you were not born atheists or raised as an atheist, I was not born a Christian.
These are awesome. Poetry but stories. Love it.
It's hilarious. I was a little worried as I neared the end and he hadn't yet mentioned Veronica Mars. Best show on TV.
What the hell is wrong with this guy? Is he going for a world record of most hated leader? Because if he is, he's doing a damn good job at it.
Well, to begin with, the translation they are using is the King James version, which is not very accurate. The KJV was based off of manuscripts from the 10th century AD and later, where as modern translations come from texts dating as far back as the 3rd and 4th centuries. Understanding of ancient Biblical Hebrew and Greek has also obviously increased since 1600 (when the KJV was written) as well. For example, one of the verses they cite, Deuteronomy 4:40, in the KJV reads, "That thou mayest prolong **thy days upon the earth**, which the Lord thy God giveth thee for ever.". Where as in the NIV it reads, "Keep his decrees and commands, which I am giving you today, so that it may go well with you and your children after you and that you may **live long in the land** the LORD your God gives you for all time." Now obviously these people aren't going to live forever and thus be able to live in the land forever, but it is a symbolic representation of God's covenant with Israel. Deuteronomy 4:40 is not referring to the earth as a planet, but rather as the land the Israelites knew. This rendering also fits in the context of the verse, where Moses is speaking to the Israelites about their future in the land of Canaan. Anyway, their first example is an excellent example of not looking at the verses in context with the rest of the Bible. Yes, the current earth will be destroyed, but verses such as Isaiah 56 speak of "a new heavens and a new earth" (actually, they reference this one). So while the current version of the earth will not always be around, earth itself will, and that's what the verses provided are getting at. Another example they provide, which is "is dancing a sin" is a great example of taking the verses out of context. For example, they reference Exodus 32, which says, "And it came to pass, as soon as he came nigh unto the camp, that he saw the calf, and the dancing: and Moses' anger waxed hot.... And Moses said unto Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that thou hast brought so great a sin upon them?" They actually italicize dancing as if it is the sin of the Israelites, but in the context of the entire passage, that is obviously not the case. The act of dancing wasn't sinful, it was the act of worshipping the golden calf which was sinful. I'm actually very suprised they even tried to call this an inconsistency because its *really* stretching it to call it one. The same goes with the other verses they referenced to try and show that the Bible says dancing is sin. I could keep going with these examples, but I think I have provided enough to show some of the major problems with these so-called "inconsistencies". One thing that should be known about Ecclesiastes is it by nature is a very contradictory book. Solomon (the author) praises different actions and desires and in the very next sentence will speak of how worthless they are. Basically alluding to the fact on how great things are at first but how they quickly lose their luster. That's why by the end of the book, you see him make a succinct summary, "Now all has been heard; here is the conclusion of the matter: Fear God and keep his commandments, for this is the whole duty of man." But again, most of these alleged contradictions would not even be pointed out if critics would take the time to read many of the passages in context instead of isolating sentences and trying to make them read what they aren't. I mean, The Bible actually says, "there is no God"...but if you read the entire verse in context, it reads, "The fool says there is no God". Obviously you can see the problem with chosing one verse out of a collection of 66 books and trying to interpret the verse just by itself.
&gt;in any case these commandments are too focused on debunking theism *Exactly*.
hey jerks, if you don't like a comment then reply to it, don't vote it down. I hardly ever see comments voted *up* here.
I would like to see this same chart with the addition of: # GDP   # Unemployment data   
that's what I thought too.
Liked it. However I'm just a bit unsure whether to show this one to my better half. The swelling has only just subsided since I tried to explain to her how the theory of the SEP field applied to chores.  (SEP - Somebody Else's Problem - field - an invisibility cloak, from the Hitchhikers Guide to the Galaxy or one of it's sequels.)
You can see charts like that at the CIA factbook. The following link is for Canada: http://www.cia.gov/cia/publications/factbook/geos/ca.html
Store what under the seat?
I saw a small circus in France last year where a girl threaded her long hair through a 2 inch steel ring from which she was hoisted up in the air and spun around at high speed .....
I don't understand...what exactly is this court case about? Does anyone know? &gt; Signor Cascioli maintains that early Christian writers confused Jesus with John of Gamala, an anti-Roman Jewish insurgent in 1st-century Palestine. Right...because its common for thousands of people to just completely get people confused. Why exactly would even the Jewish rabbis mention Christ (albeit negatively) in the Talmud if he didn't exist? That in itself should be the first proof that whatever claims are being made is bunk - as there are several extra-Biblical sources that mention Christ, the Talmud being only one of them. Its debatable as to whether Christ really was who he said he was...but to go as far as to say that not only he didn't exist, but the Gospel accounts are based off of completely misidentifying a person is ludicrous.
Informasi beasiswa Indonesia. Beasiswa skripsi, beasiswa kuliah s1 s2 dan s3.Email, informasi.beasiswa-at-gmail-dot-com. Kunjungi http://informasi-beasiswa.blogspot.com
"Signor Cascioli, author of a book called The Fable of Christ, began legal proceedings against Father Righi three years ago after the priest denounced Signor Cascioli in the parish newsletter for questioning Christ’s historical existence."
Indonesian blogs review. Indonesian blogs directory - daftar lengkap blog Indonesia.
So he's sueing because the man made negative remarks about him? The whole trial just seems very odd.
Beasiswa indonesia dan beasiswa luar negeri
They sound pretentious and ignorant at the same time. If you are going to parody the 10 commandments put some effort into it.
islam and muslim and islamic teachings
Thanks for the link. It seems that there is a strong correlation between the Number of Vacation days and the Unemployment Rate.  So more vacation days tends to mean fewer jobs. Bummer. :(
&gt;Did Hitler not believe in himself? Did Jeffrey Dahmer not believe in himself? If we have no ultimate authority on what is right or wrong, what business do you have telling the murderer that he is doing wrong? Perhaps he is only doing what he believes right (see Hitler). I'm not a Christian, but what business do you have telling the murderer that what he is doing is wrong? I thought God was the judge?  I guess you as a Christian know better, are obviously a better person then me (and Hitler). Because I believe in myself I can not hold a moral code right? That seems to be your arguement. You are so wrapped up in defending your faith you forget that faith is an individual thing. Have you ever heard the saying "The road to hell is paved with good intentions"?  Most people who are evil do them because they think they are doing right, athiest (see Hitler) or not (see Crusades, slavery, Isreal/Pakistan). In the end its not the religion that is important, it is the people.
When you are sailing and just starting to get a little speed there is a wide angle around where the wind is coming called the "no-go zone", simply because if you face it you will go nowhere fast. After you pick up speed that angle shrinks because your momentum nullifies fringe effects of the wind acting upon you, so you can tighten up your angle and face a little more into the wind (but never completely into it).  So his analogy is that the wind is the big problem and the more you get to work on the problem (the more velocity you pick up) the more directly you can face it, even if you never can face it directly.
It is easier here just to mark up/down the comments you agree/disagree with. But yes, I believe that people should comment more, rather than rate when possible - we'd have more interesting discussion here. Sometimes though, it's better just to mark the remarks about Bush, Lisp and Paul Graham down that you don't agree with and move along. As for the comments on this particular story, I don't agree with most of them. I honestly think this guy's paintings are fantastic, I could never paint like that. I also get the sense there's this feeling that he's been wasting his time somehow. Huh?
He didn't make 'negative remarks', something that anyone can do. He took part in that much more exclusive activity denouncing, which is available only to the rabidly fanatical.
This is news??  It was on digg 4 months ago
Well, it's on reddit now.
This would explain the robe, sandals and long hair ;-)
Indead.
Denouncing really can refer to an entire range of things. I wonder where you get the idea that its "only available to the radibly fanatical". Denouncing could be anything from "his works are incorrect" to "he's burning in hell". I mean, really...it could go from one extreme to another. I quick look-up on the literal definition (not that it really matters): 1.  To condemn openly as being evil or reprehensible. See Synonyms at criticize.  2. To accuse formally.  3. To give formal announcement of the ending of (a treaty). Robbie, aren't you "comdemning openly" those who are "rabidly fanatical"? Should we take you to court for that? Oddly enough, in doing the same thing you are condemning...are you now a "radidly fanatical" person also? I do not literally mean what I just said, but your snap judgement on the situation when the article isn't very specific is a little off. The whole trial seems more than a little bizarre. A priest denounces (this could mean a myriad of things) a man who is denouncing the person of Jesus Christ, so now the man takes the priest to court and is sueing him? And on top of that the judge wants the priest to prove Jesus Christ exists? Like I said, the whole thing sounds ridiculous and bizarre. And for the record, I'm not a Roman Catholic if anyone feels like trying to use that against me. 
I always found we should just apply the 3 laws of robotics to humanity and live by that :)
&gt; I'm not a Christian, but what business do you have telling the murderer that what he is doing is wrong? I thought God was the judge? I'm really not sure what you are trying to say. Yes, I believe God is the judge. &gt; I guess you as a Christian know better, are obviously a better person then me (and Hitler). Why the snide remarks? Where did I even imply that in anything I've written? &gt; Because I believe in myself I can not hold a moral code right? That seems to be your arguement. You are so wrapped up in defending your faith you forget that faith is an individual thing. First of all, what exactly does "believing in yourself mean"? And again, if faith is an individual thing, then we have no right to condemn murderers, rapists, racists...really anything we condemn today. If its all a personal thing, who is to say what is right and wrong? &gt; Have you ever heard the saying "The road to hell is paved with good intentions"? Most people who are evil do them because they think they are doing right, athiest (see Hitler) or not (see Crusades, slavery, Isreal/Pakistan). In the end its not the religion that is important, it is the people. Yeah, that's pretty much what I was saying.
It stinks!
just to add more info:  Sweden 25 days, 40 h/week  Norway 20 days, 37,5 h/week (usually 25 days if you don't have any overtime pay). In both countries 0 days if you are independent contractor ;-)
You're posting this on a site that does the same thing already. A competitor.  Tell me, what were you thinking?
And coming from Y-Combinator, has a financial interest in its success.
At the [SDF Public Access UNIX System](http://sdf.lonestar.org) this has been the norm since *1987*, long before AOL and web0.2.0
Probably a good cause in the end, but it would have been nice if it didn't sound so dumb when you pronounce it:P
This may not be for everyone, but for anyone doing research in an academic setting, this paper gives some good tips.
I disagree: 1) Their debt load is certainly high for a manufacturing company, but not so bad considering that 2) It is, as you noted, more of a financial company -- which is understandable, since financing is where (again, like you said), so 3) I don't quite understand why you want them to focus on making cars (which you note that they're bad at) instead of loans (which you admit that they're good at), and finally 4) Your analogy is flawed; the Dow is not supposed to represent all companies from when they're added ad infinitum -- it adjusts based on changing circumstances, and I'd be that America's transition from a manufacturing to an information/financial economy is quite a transition. Look at the original Dow: There's only one company from that list that's still in the Dow, and it's GE -- a perfect exemplar of the manufacturing-to-banking transformation.
It's hard to say without seeing the denouncement itself and the exact reasons for bringing the case about. It's a shame the article doesn't mention this. To me it sounds like some sort of slander case.
Another clone of Reddit written in Lisp. This was just written as a fun experiment and not as a backlash against Reddit for switching to Python. It does, however, provide the source code, so it should be interesting reading for anyone learning Lisp and wondering how to use for day-to-day programming tasks.
This is a good resource for any Emacs user.
pays?
anyone have more details?
This code example implements the soundex algorithm from Donald Knuth.  It is used to encode a word into a sound definition (for Enlish speakers only), thus the sound encoding can be used to match a submitted word (particularly English surnames) to a list of similar words.  E.g., it could be quite usefull in a simple spell checking or dictionary program.
Great window on the ruby coommunity. Follow the comments.  The ruby community is a great bunch of people. It is like the early perl or lisp communities. I hope they keep their freshness. They are aware of their specialness and are trying.
When Gandhi died, Albert Einstein said "Generations to come will scarce believe that such a one as this walked the earth in flesh and blood." s/gandhi/jesus/g
It's amazing how anonymous the Internet is that something this big could be hidden.  I'm sure the VCs must have looked into this, but stranger things have happened . . .
this article strikes me as being *so* painfully wrong.  right, pointers are hard.  but guess what? memory management isn't programming.  punching holes in cards isn't programming. the article is essentially saying that we need to separate the men from the boys by having them concentrate on irrelevant details.  fair enough, if that makes sense to you, but please don't pretend these details have *anything* to do with the process of writing computer programs. in my modest experience, the opposite is true.  have someone spend a decade managing memory and counting bits, then put them in an environment when they don't have any such distractions - when a function that adds x and y reads "let add x y = x + y", and they will reliably produce bullshit, because they have forgotten how to actually write programs, having spent so much time worring about whatever irrelevancies were imposed on them by their language of choice. C might be a good choice to teach for other reasons, like it provokes understanding of efficiency or machine architecture, which are valuable insights, but not because it is worthwhile to concentrate on C because it is "more difficult"   junk, junk, junk.
Error in application retrievr  Maximum Thread count reached. They don't seem ready for that much attention.
this appears to be pretty cool, but from my (very few) searches it appeared that much more emphasis was in the color than the shape. using thin, black lines i was amazed at how some of the images matched closely to my drawing.  edit--after reading how it works it makes sense that color matters more, but you can still get cool b+w images by drawing in black
... and provide the user with a way to find data items easily and quickly.
&gt; As for Anderson, rumor had it he didn’t shower often, would sleep at the office, and refused to drive a car for a while and took the bus everywhere despite having plenty of money. Everyone knows that living frugally even though you are rich is unamerican.
The first one is amazing.
I find it hard to believe Americans only get 13 days per year. I live in Canada and it seems like we have roughly the same amount of Statutory Holidays per year... So basically that means that Canadians get 13 'extra' days from their employers.
I detected a hint of sarcasm in robbie's post. Maybe I misread it, so I wouldnt take it too seriously. If anything I got the sense that hes agreeing with you by using hyperbole. This article lacks any kind of description about the court case itself, it just needlessly incites religious debate.
Up here in 'Soviet Canuckistan' we have free health care.
Heh.  "The only thing more off-putting than rank elitism is the me-too wheezing of the other 95%"
Interesting. Don't think I've ever seen a poll of just active duty military.
We assume the military is "frustrated" because a speech line didn't draw applause? How that is a basis for drawing a broad conclusion? Maybe the military really is frustrated. Was there a stronger basis in the article and I missed it?
Prove Justice exists.
SmashMyViper.com is destroying a Dodge Viper for the chance to make a million dollars in order to start their own business. It's not a scam, as they have videos and pictures of the damage (Plus their model girls!). If you read through the FAQ and blog, it's actually a very clever idea.
This has urban legend written all over it.
So these are illegal in the US? They probably don't meet (ie. violate) FCC standards. Whats the big deal? It seems to me that everyone has cell phones now. I think the social customs will be self correcting and the next generation is gonna think these people are even more old-fogey then I do.
Nope, only in the footer.
Sounds like a job for the *orchestrasound* Blogosphere! hehe
Bush is going for a world record of "Most Hated by The Guardian," which is different. I'm losing faith in The Guardian as a source of worthwhile editorials. I'm having trouble dragging myself to read this one. I haven't even read the article and I already have questions. Is the US curbing public spending because private investment is heating up? I have serious doubt that The Guardian would bother to research and report such a fact. So why bother reading them? I have these questions because it's The Guardian. Which should bother me considering the high quality of their science section. But apparently, a high quality science department does not a solid editorial section make. I don't mind reading stuff that attacks my view, but when a source establishes a pattern of incomplete reasoning, I get suspicious and lose interest.
Watch "Gunner Palace" or "Off to war". The opinions expressed by the young men dying seem to agree with The Onion.  Or perhaps these documentaries are just more Hollywood Liberal Elite hokum...
Hot props to "Say Something."
this man is hated, and I hate him too..
Wow, this is quite simply amazing.  I drew a basic scene that was kind of like a tricolour flag with light yellow on the bottom, dark blue in the middle and light blue on top.  Lo and behold, it found beach scenes, just as I had wanted.  This is really, really cool!
Agreed. I read them all and it was my favorite.
A social networking tool which provides members with the opportunity to help and be helped by others. [via eHub]
http://sports.espn.go.com/mlb/players/profile?statsId=4326
"Filesystems are just a very stupid and restricted kind of database" /Pretty/ much. But relational databases are also a stupid and restricted kind of Unix filesystem (among other things, no mount()!) and indeed the Unix filesystem is a stupid and restricted kind of Unix filesystem (among other things, various crippling restrictions on the power of mount()). At the same time, no matter how powerful your database/file metadata system, you'll still want to have powerful and efficient ad hoc/unstructured search as proposed by Raskin (and others). (And then you can mount the search results as directories...) (I've been posting some relevant things to reiserfs-list, and I hope to post some more. If you're interested, see my posts since last May, which start with http://article.gmane.org/gmane.comp.file-systems.reiserfs.general/14107 , after reading Future Vision http://www.namesys.com/whitepaper.html of course.)
ugh.  I had to stop after just a few tips.  the writer seemed like such an arrogant prick it kind of made me ill.
This seems to jump from reporting research on stress to a self help article. Still, the results are interesting, though there isn't much to be learnt in the way of relieving it. Personally, I've found that [releasing the tension](http://walking.about.com/cs/stretching/a/loosenup3_p.htm) in your shoulders works quite well to relieve stress.
So his reasoning is, "Alarmists have been wrong in the past, so they must be wrong now about global warming."  That's totally specious reasoning: true but misleading, IMHO.
post a link not requiring a login, please
I appreciate your apology, but a lot of other people did find it funny, so I suggest you keep your curmudgeonly ways to yourself.
Food for thought.  I don't think he's saying that they're wrong about global warming, but certainly points out that environmentalists don't have a great track record.
PLEASE. How, exactly, did tips on "how not to look like an asshole" *from an asshole* make it onto the hot list? Here's how not to look like an asshole when ordering wine: "I'd like some cabernet sauvignon, please.  Thank you."
That's a resubmit of http://reddit.com/info?id=17967 
In _A Connoisseur's Guide to the Mind_, Roger Schank says, Always pick the cheapest bottle. The clear implication of the article is "try next door", or if not next door somewhere that the wait staff isn't grading you to flunk. Pity we don't know where "next door" is.
This should be split screened with the raw footage of President Bush's actions during the exact same time.
&lt;quote&gt;but to go as far as to say that not only he didn't exist, but the Gospel accounts are based off of completely misidentifying a person is ludicrous.&lt;/quote&gt; It is certainly not ludicrous, and I contest the 'proof' you mention. It is perhaps not common knowledge, but a rational look at the evidence seems to exclude that Jesus ever existed. For example see http://www.jesusneverexisted.com/scholars.html
In the late 70's/early 80's ICL came up with a content addressable file store (CAFS) which aimed to address some of these issues, although it still used a query language to retrieve content. See http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Content_Addressable_File_Store for a synopsis.
I'd like to buy "On Lisp".
GDP is overemphasised by economists, imo.
Let me see if I get this argument: The world is complicated and science is imperfect, ergo we should stop trying to protect the environment on the basis of scientifc predictions.  Looks like "intelligent design" for weather! It's a long walk from science fiction author to scientist, and  this fellow seems to have come into the spotlight because he's saying what industry wants to hear, not because he has meaningfully falsified one iota of the arguments concerning global warming.  Informed scepticism is helpful and necessary; uninformed scepticism of this sort smells suspiciously like paid lobbying.
Why not just full-text search?  Google desktop search is one of the very few things I miss in linux-with it, I was consistently able to find anything I had on my desktop within seconds.  The index is fairly large, but I have plenty of HD space, so I don't care much. There are definite benefits to a hierarchical filesystem for programmers, and full-text search is extremely hard to beat for most people's search needs, but I don't see where a DB would help much-the relational model does not apply in an obvious way to a random collection of files, with wildly divergent purposes and formats.  How would you organize a home directory in a database?
Odd, the difference in the number of people killed in Gandhi's name and the number killed in that other guy's name.
gmcg - Chrichton has an MD from Harvard medical school, which in my book qualifies at least as a scientific background.  It seemed to me that all of his examples were footnoted, so I'm not really sure why you'd say he was uninformed.
It is pretty common for people to believe stupid things, mutually inconsistent things, and impossible things, so I don't see a priori why getting the identity of some guy who lived 2 thousand years ago wrong is all that much of a stretch, particularly given that the single source that tells us the most about him is, as I understand it, a mishmash of nth generation translations of oral histories with some things thrown in that require a rather nonstandard understanding of several branches of science. That said, the case really is pretty wierd. Here is a somewhat coherent translation from italian of a filing by  Luigi Cascioli: (It's from a site that bears his name, so a grain of salt may be in order): http://www.luigicascioli.it/12processo_eng.php  And here is a purported translation of luigi's initial letter of complaint:  http://www.christianism.com/html/notes/8note57.html It seems that the article really does explain about all there is to the case.  Righi says that Jesus existed, Cascioli thinks not, and sued him under something that sounds like an anti-propaganda law.  Maybe it is something   left over from WWII?  I believe that Germany has some laws that forbid certain forms of expression as propaganda or something-perhaps that is where this law comes from? As a side note, calling Christ's divinity debatable is a bit of a stretch.  It is demonstrably believable for at least some people, but it is not really something on which there can be much of any true debate.
A rather extensive treatment on this phenomenon can be found in Freakonomics, by the way.
you know i think these statistics are made up 
This speech mostly deals with society's capacity for acting based on fear rather than information. We should take Crichton's message as a warning and nothing more. No matter the issue, the questions remain the same: 1) What do we know?  2) What can we do with what we know? Hopefully Crichton's writings provoke people to ask these questions about global warming. Despite his polemics, I'm sure that even he would be pleased if people took it upon themselves to learn about the science behind the headlines.
When I criticize the Chrichton essay as uninformed, I do not mean that I think that the author is stupid (or short a graduate degree) -- I do mean that the structure of his argument is such that it appears to refute and/or falsify theories related to global warming while cleverly refusing to provide any information at all.   Absurd generalizatoins -- approaching an undeclared general theory of warnings -- are pointed to for evidence that climate change warnings are baseless.  For example: "One interesting feature is the tendency to reversals: a benefit becomes a hazard and then becomes a benefit again. Butter is good, then bad, then good again. Saccharine is good, then bad, then good." Why not generalize from our experiences with asbestos and lead to reach the opposite conclusion?  There is no meat to the argument.   Where is the counter-evidence?  It sounds like it's coming ... I kept waiting for it ... but the closest we get is news that the saccharine hullabaloo came to nothing.  No new evidence, and a silly, invalid form of argument: That is what I mean by uninformed.
Cascioli says "that there are not other records of Christ other than the Biblical account". Very easy proof of that being false is that Christ is mentioned in the Talmud. The fact that Christ was mentioned in other nonBiblical sources really is not debatable. The Bible has shown time and time again to be an accurate account of history. People debated that the Hittites ever existed (they were mentioned in the Bible). Lo and behold, their civilization was discovered around the end of the 19th century. People debated if Pilate ever existed...a cornerstone that says, "Potius Pilate, procurator of the Jews" has been found in ancient Caeseara Phillippi. As I stated in another post, Sir William Ramsay was an atheist who set out using the Book of Acts as his guidebook at disprove it and show that it was a product of 3rd century myths. He began excavating in the Mediterranean and suprised everyone when he came back and made the comment in his book, "I consider Luke a historian of the first rank". If Christ did not exist, the Jewish rabbis (they had more reason that anyone to say that he didn't exist) would not have mentioned them in the Talmud. Instead of denying that he existed, they attribute his actions to being a bastard child, being a sorceror, etc. Josephus mentions Christ (altough the lengths to which he does are albeit debatable). Tacitus, a Roman historian, mentions Christ. By 64 AD, Nero was already blaming things on a new religious group, the Christians, which implies that the religion necessarily began earlier. John and other writers claimed to be first-hand witnesses of Christ, and then went out and preached this gospel for absolutely no gain and were stoned, crucified, and mocked for this gospel. If you know for a fact that something is a lie...how often is it that a man is willing to die for that lie? I could mention many evidences, but the simple truth is...if Christ did not exist a tall, the Jewish rabbis (who again, would love to deny that he existed anyway), would not have bothered writing about him in the Talmud. Why would you make negative statements about a man who never existed? So again, if Christ was indeed just a misidentified person, then not only did the Christians do the misidentifying, but the leading Jewish religious leaders did as well. And I can assure you, the Jews would not be confusing their heretics. And John of Gamala? A quick Google on his name reveals a bunch of fiction books with him as a leader character. There are no scholarly sources that mention him. If anything, it would seem that he was the one who did not exist. Something else I wanted to add: for the disciples to completely fabricate the story of Jesus makes absolutely no sense at all. They added detailst that would have severly restricted the popularity of the religion. For example...the Gospel accounts attribute divinity to Jesus, a man. This was completely contrary to the Jewish idea of God as an invisible all-powerful force. Infact, the Jews were so opposed to setting limits to God, that they wouldn't even write his name. For the disciples to fabricate the story of Christ as actually being God would have been pretty much a suicidal way to start their religion in the eyes of the Jews. In addition, Christ would not have been a popular God in the eyes of the Romans who did not have a positive view of the Jews and who had powerful gods such as Jupiter. This story of a Jewish god dying on the cross, embarassing himself by being naked and defecating on himself would not have been attractive to any Romans. And something that would not have been attractive to either Roman or Jew was the account by each Gospel that the first person to reach Christ's grave and to discover he was missing was a woman. This would be seen as making a woman a witness (ie, highly accountable) and was not something that happened in either society. There are many more examples of things like these, but in short, Christianity is the exact opposite of the type of religion you just make up. There are so many unnecessary and seemingly negative details in the Gospel accounts that its just laughable to suppose that the man of Jesus was a myth. It spread in spite of itself, not because of itself. Again, you can debate the divinity of Christ all day, but to act like he didn't even exist is just ludicrous.
I happened to find what the case is about from Cascioli's own site: "According to article 661 of the Italian Penal Code, there is an abuse of popular credulity when someone, by means of fraud, deceives a great number of people. In this particular case, the ministers of religion of the Catholic Church, like Righi in the present case, by committing historical falsity, therefore presenting invented facts as if true and actually occurred – but useful to religious doctrine – they deceive all the people that come into contact with the teachings of such religion, by inducing them to believe in that religion, not on the basis of purely theological reasoning (totally legitimate and admissible), but on the basis of a deceptive representation of the facts." I was thinking it would be interesting if Cascioli had to prove that John of Gamala existed as well. Because otherwise isn't he doing the same thing he is sueing someone for if John of Gamala did not exist?
honestly, who wants to see this?
Affero GPL? I thought AaronSw would be releasing it under the BSD license, since I figured that was part of the reason he chose PostgreSQL. Apparently not.
Surely there was a "real reason" (or at least proximate cause) for choosing PostgreSQL that hasn't yet been disclosed, wasn't there? So how about letting us in on the secret?
I didn't "choose" PostgreSQL, although reddit runs on it. But infogami currently runs on MySQL and web.py will support both as soon as I get a spare moment.
Just days after an AMD dual core laptop was reviewed... so begins the battle of the marketing departments.
I got 2858. You?
wow
my best was 2411, this is very addicting.
Nice job Microsoft. Don't let any of that "freedom talk" get in the way of making some money
Is it my imagination or did that article go off on a random tangent half way through?  Did two articles get spliced together or did the author just decide to go off subject on to random gibberings about their personal ethical standpoint when it comes to copyright?  Weird.
I found the text article as interesting as the video.
Well he has written a book that more or less claims it.
[Carlton Banks](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/The_Fresh_Prince_of_Bel-Air#Carlton_Banks)
You are the only person who gets that joke, and you pretend it doesn't exist.
I go places by bus/train/bicycle and refuse to drive a car.  Does this make me wierd?
will it always be a single python file?
I am in quality, and productivity in my area of concern is not considered by others as a choice but a must. I have no choice but to muster the energy from somewhere to meet those demands. But, like everyone else I allso procrastinate. I have developed over a period of time, a habit, so to speak, whereby I have allready measured my capability of meeting the before date of the deadline, whether it is my own or for the company that I work for. In other words I allow myself to procrastinate for a period of time before the whistle blows. This can be measured in days to weeks. However, this is probably my downfall in terms of productivity, because there should be a balance. A simplistic example, 'If you eat to much, you get sick', as with drinking. As my companion allways says, 'Too much of anything is not good'. I however love to procrastinate. I do alot of creative thinking in this area. Actually at the end of the day, I don't think that anyone in a 'work for money senario' has any choice, but to be productive. Money is what make the world tick. On a more serious note, a comment that I read stated that one must tackle a problem by Identifying and breaking up the area of concern so as to be able to understand it better and therefore to enable positive productivity. This is definitely a good approach. The above and all the other suggestions are great ideas, but who feels like doing them. This is too much for one day, I think I'll go and watch some tv.   
Waiting with baited breath....
This sounds like a personal attack. I don't see what the big deal is if this company chooses not to flaunt the people who run it - they realise people are interested in what the site does, not the vanity of the CEO etc
It really annoys me to be forced to listen to other people's conversations on the bus or train.  If it's not two loudmouthed people then it's a potty mouth screaming into her cellphone.  I've been cursed and threatened after politely asking cellphone shouters to "please keep it down."  A gadget like this would allow me to force civility on those around me.  But despite the benefits, the certainty of disrupting legitimate and conscientious cellphone use makes the employment of jammers unethical.
Sucks to live in the UK!
Great article. I am very interested in search and have also been watching the social networking aspect of many sites, including this one. I'm pleased that Yahoo has woken up to it as competition for Google can only help all of us
I think there is a much deeper, and possibly darker, reason for choosing PostgresSQL that hasn't been disclosed as yet. Indeed, I think that web.py is a cunning attempt to capture all Python programmers into his evil clutches before pushing them all to programming in Lisp once he has their minds. Obviously just my own thoughts here
The author starts: "Yesterday I had two literary experiences with nothing in common: I watched Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire with my family and I read an article entitled What is Code in Free Software Magazine." This is a brilliant reflection about writing software while recognizing your audience.
Cleaning beaches in South Africa
i think you're right. some of them make sense but then i see that singapore is less corrupt than sweden???
"you'll still want to have powerful and efficient ad hoc/unstructured search" google desktop / apple spotlight "And then you can mount the search results as directories..." apple smart folders
wow! the future is here at last :o! great link :)!
Have you read the mentions of Jesus in the Talmud? A large grain of salt is needed to assume that any of them refer to the biblical Jeses.  It seems to me that the religion invented Jesus, not the other way around.
Were you planning it or were you just lucky?
First off, they are using the words incorrectly, they are not actually talking about a file system, but rather, a directory structure.  The directory structure is really a naming convention that has a particular purpose: to uniquely identify files.  Any system that does not have at least an implicit directory structure will have data loss because two different files that are the same in the namespace will not be distinguishable.
Wow. What a numbskull.
It is not evil
My version - http://www.24dot1.com/weblog/archives/5
Again, the Jesus that was invented (assuming he was) would have been the most illogical thing created. He would not be appealing to the Romans or the Jews, and the idea that the "religion invented Jesus" goes against the culture of the societies in which Christianity spread at the time. The truth is, most of you probably don't doubt that Buddha or Muhammad existed. But when it comes to Christ, it all of a sudden becomes a very debatable issue. The website you have provided offers very little evidence to what you are claiming. Sure, it offers the words of "scholars", but I could list just as many scholars to you that believe that Christ did exist. Something that should make you question how valid that site is is very few of the men listed are historians. People such as Voltaire are listed who had an absolute rabid hatred of Christianity. Voltaire was so hypocritical as to condemn Christians for crimes they committed against others (and rightly so), and then rejoiced when churches were destroyed and Christians were murdered during the French Revolution. Yeah, your site lists people like Ralph Waldo Emerson, but as great of a writer he was, he is certainly not someone you go to for historical matters. There are very few real historians that doubt that Christ existed. If they doubt anything, it is whether or not he was divine.
insightful, especially for those of us currently in academia.
It clearly lists it's source at the bottom of the list (www.transperency.org). It is based on surveys since there is obviously no empirical way of determining 'corruption'. You may be interested in this url: http://www.transparency.org/news_room/faq/corruption_faq
:-S
neither of those sites say how they actually collect said 'data' which seems to be the hardest part of such a survey. frankly, simply because how they collect the data is not well-displayed on either page, makes me doubt how useful it is.
It's just a badly designed sign, not self-referential.  The sign is still necessary: to warn people not to stick their heads outside the handrail; otherwise one's head will get stuck into the acute angle that forms between the handrial &amp; the horizontal metal frame (that's attached to the stone wall).
453, second time.
1628 on the second try but not much after that. It seems totally random as you simply can't plan a thousand moves ahead.
Funny.
If you need signs to explain how to use an escalator, than it's just a badly designed escalator to begin with. Besides, someone who is stupid enough to get decapitated by sticking his head outside the handrail is most probably incapable of understanding (or even noticing) any signs, either.
nice
Pictures you see in the press don't do Mars justice.  Check out these true-color pics.
The point about the way interruptions kill productivity is one of the central themes in "Peopleware" by DeMarco and Lister, which I highly recommend as one of the best books you'll ever read, even if you're not involved in software.
well done.
why is not the book free too?
I don't get it. Am I being docile?
I don't know how they can even call it a 'CD' with those restrictions.  They deserve a class action lawsuit for deceptive trade practices.
"Patent Absurdity" - isn't that almost redundant today, "Patent" alone automatically implies "absurd".
We need only look at Scientology in the last few decennia to see how absurd and illogical religions can flourish.   Most scholars writing about Jesus have been religious themselves, and many non-religious historians would rather avoid the issue, for fear of threading on religious toes.  The webpage I offered provides little evidence because the author is reviewing some of the writers who have written about the myth of Jesus over the past 200 years - I don't think his goal with that webpage was to convert believers into skeptics.
Excellent.  I'm saving it for my granddaughter.  She's three months old 
It's a spoof of the [Million Dollar Homepage](http://www.milliondollarhomepage.com/) by Alex Tew, who wanted to raise money to fund his university studies.
Sorta' like http://zerodollarhomepage.com, except they actually let you apply for pixels.
It's an interesting article but like many of the people who have commented here, I disagree with much of what he says.  Two things stand out in particular: first, I don't think most people live in fear.  I think most people live in a cocoon of blissful ignorance perpetuated by media, government and experts who always try to make it sound like everything is in control and that there isn't much to worry about (i.e., they sound like Crichton in this lecture). Second, I disagree with his characterization of complex systems that can only be "managed", not controlled.  This is the rationale we always get for why globalism, for example, is unstoppable.  It's a "complex system" so we need to manage it, because we can't control it.  In other words, we can't control our own destiny, because it's too complicated.  We need to sit back and "manage" things, not try to change things, according to Crichton.
There is a double spooking the world, the double of abstraction. The fortunes of states and armies, companies and communities depend on it. All contending classes – the landlords and farmers, the workers and capitalists – revere yet fear the relentless abstraction of the world on which their fortunes yet depend. All the classes but one. The hacker class.
Paul, Great article. But all your theory goes against money making with open source. If I am thinking of a commercial version of an open source product, it will be easy to copy by competitors (Duh!!). Do you think, is it still possible to make money with an open source product? Sampath
Sigh, you're right. If you look at the source you'll see that web.py is really nothing more than a Lisp interpreter.
do you have something against ASS?
to any intelligent person with Real Media Decoder :(
Just curious down-voters, but what about the essay don't you agree with?  It seems to me like a wake up call, and you are hitting the snooze button - or have you already ripped the alarm clock out of the wall?
Why do you so dishonor your son? I work in Iraq and see these kids every day. There is no draft! They're here by choice and proud of it. Many are on a second tour, some a third tour. Your son wished to be a soldier or he wouldn't have been here. Show his decisions and goals the honor they deserve. And, if you wish to whine, please do it in private and stop the politics!
What a stupid article.  Trailer trash telling the other trailer trash how to not look like a rube in his stupid bistro. BFD. Wish I could knock more than a point off this dumb article. 
from the faq  "One thing to keep in mind is that retrievr doesn't do object/face/text recognition of any kind, so if you're drawing an outline sketch of a chair, it almost certainly won't get you one back (except your index only contains images of chairs). The same holds for corporate logos, icons &amp;c. It helps to think of it as matching the most pronounced shapes and slabs of colors." Why do you think they don't give you a finer pen? The most compelling results for me have been when I just used two or three colours, with extremely simple arrangements (ie blue background with red blob in bottom left corner). I can't wait for them to add more images.
wow, that is werry funny.
thanks. that makes a lot more sense now. Million dollar homepage is actually sort of cool, for a short while.
the best i could do with careful planning was 2357. took a while to set up. i tried another pattern that got about 2050. how'd you guys get the higher scores? random? planned?
eh? you joking right?
well, I'm learning Python and so are all the guys in our huge team (well, 4 of us), so hopefully that will help next time around :)
I think the sign physically stops you from being decapitated. The self-referential picture is just a bonus.
One of the most insightful essays about the video game industry that I have ever read. Good stuff.
Probably not, but I think it will always be a single namespace (that is, accessible by doing `web.foo` instead of `web.bar.foo`).
Looks cool - seems to serve about the same purpose as TBNL. I can't imagine why Reddit decided to use this when switching to Python ;-) Unfortunately, the Affero GPL makes it unusable for most of the projects I might have considered it for.
"The Muslim faith, whatever its merits for the believers, is a problematic business for the rest of us. There are many trouble spots around the world, but as a general rule, it's easy to make an educated guess at one of the participants" hurhurhur. This guy sucks.
A $200 tip?!? Gentlemen, we are in the wrong profession.
Backup software and home of File Access Manager
File Access Manager allows your backup software to obtain access to open and locked files.
The BBC has spearheaded a service allowing members in the UK to download and edit iconic clips from its fifty year backlog of footage.
a nonprofit organization that offers flexible copyright licenses for creative works.
The writing made good points, but yes, the effective conclusion was that the world is a dangerous place, and we can't really predict what will happen. It's especially ironic that the article criticizing fearmongering (a very good thing to do) is written by a person whose books are the very essence of fearmongering. "Prey" was a painful experience.
yep
how on earth is that funny?
Well, that's one MD from Harvard medical school who appears to not know the difference between electromagnetic radiation and a magnet - basic high school physics. Of course he probably does know the difference, but is counting on his readers to not be the brightest of scientific minds. (I had considered a similar angle myself a while ago with this silly magnetic underlay scam, but decided it was too intellectually dishonest) That's just his physics, others have pointed out the the speciousness of his argument. All of my examples are footnoted.   Credits for this comment:  Halliday, Resnick and Walker, Fundamentals of Physics, Fourth Ed., Copyright © 1993 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Inc. All rights reserved. 
The article is very genuine and refreshing. Isn't a form of "open source" type generosity when someone who succeeded offers pointers to the rest of us? What the article does not address is all the great and useful software that ends up as shareware because the creators had no sales and marketing skills. Someone else mentioned this: how do you find the users and how do you sell if you don't have $15K/month to pay a PR firm? I think Paul's recommendation is to do enough to get VC money and then hire the sales and marketing folks, but I may be wrong. jeff@mailjedi.com 
the Japanese version of this (which you can see in every Japanese mall) has a much better picture which gets the message across.
muslims are as conservative as catholics. surprise?
I'm hoping for a faster PowerBook with an Intel chip (although I heard they will NOT be bringing out a 12" PowerBook which is crazy).  I also vote for an Intel based Mac Mini which will act as a media hub that I can then buy two of, one for my car. I also vote that Steve Jobs becomes a saint.... er, maybe I've gone too far.  Thankfully after having 4 Sony Vaio's running Windows I discovered Mac OS X. Joy
Great sentence:  "Give users what they actually want, not what they say they want. And whatever you do, don't give them new features just because your competitors have them!"
I wonder if his intention is to make money, but only make a lot of money once. I wouldn't be surprised if he were getting emails along the lines of "I'll pay you $10,000" to be the only ad on your site. If there were only one ad, I bet every single person who visited that page would click on it.
New Slingbox software release: watch your cable TV for free on any smartphone.
Michal Crichton has a great point to make: We keep treating complex systems as linear, and keep making mistakes because of this. Anyone who choses to focus on the details in his argument is missing his point. Even the notion of applying stock market technical analysis to measure media coverage (or other variable in a complex system) alone was worth reading the article.
A peek at things to come!
That's just creepy.
Link crashed FireFox immediately...and I'm guessing that that was the best thing that could have happened.
That's kind of funny.
940 and going up.
1751
&gt; "you'll still want to have powerful and efficient ad hoc/unstructured search"  &gt;  &gt; google desktop / apple spotlight Pretty much. &gt; "And then you can mount the search results as directories..."  &gt;  &gt; apple smart folders A step in that direction, but AFAICS Spotlight metadata lives in its own little parallel file metadata system which never integrates with the file "naming" system except at a superficial GUI level - "smart folders" aren't directories. Spotlight is clearly a real feature for Apple and its users, but it's also clearly not the Right Thing. (Which is not to criticise Apple, or to suggest that they should have attempted the 100% solution for a point release of OS X.)
I watched this last night on the TV.  I thought the funniest part was when Letterman admitted he didn't know nearly as much about the subject as O'Reilly but that was going to disagree anyway.
or beagle or kat
With FUSE you can hook up a SQL database into your filesystem. But that's not the point. Storing anything with any structure is impossible. You wouldn't be able to recall it.
A University professor at a well known institution of higher learning challenged his students with this question. "Did God create everything that exists?"  ... a true story !
Yes, I don't mean to be rude, but I don't know why this is "newsworthy". Muslims hold the same stance must Christian fundamentalists do - and in many cases much stricter. This really shouldn't suprise anyone. Besides, even if it was only one man that believed this, why is it newsworthy? It just seems like anything that is convtrovsersial gets bumped up in reddit really fast, especially if it is religious in nature.
I got 2760 while trying to get all the bits pointing the same way.  I had big blocks pointing different ways at the start of that run.
" ...it's not about race, it's about culture. If 100% of your population believes in liberal pluralist democracy, it doesn't matter whether 70% of them are "white" or only 5% are. But if one part of your population believes in liberal pluralist democracy and the other doesn't, then it becomes a matter of great importance whether the part that does is 90% of the population or only 60%, 50%, 45%." I'm 'liberal' on so many issues but I just can't figure out why so many people find the above sentiment unacceptable
Unfortunately for the well known student of higher physics making his argument, the parallel doesn't hold up if you use God as the antonym of evil. "good" would make more sense...
I never new Carleton was a quality comp sci school. I go to Western and I figure we're with McMaster, tied for third behind Waterloo and Toronto when it comes to comp sci prestige.
lol. Anyway, Million Dollar Homepage was a beast that fed itself. People wanted to buy ads because it was the thing to do...but buying ads wasn't even smart because nobody was going to click on them and that was especially going to ring true months and years from them going up. I see why people paid for ads, but at the same time, it doesn't make sense for them to have.
this is about as old as humanity.
it was simple enough to understand without whitespace.
How about a Guerrila guide to being interviewed?
From the reddit FAQ: "What is reddit? "A source for what's new and popular on the web -- customized for you." Links don't have to be "newsworthy", controversial subjects are popular.
As a software engineer that works on projects for small companies, I hope that my work will never become well-known, because I'm sure I must be infringing patents left and right.
It's nice to see O'Reilly get bullied like he bullies other people.  He is such an asshole.
An Excerpt....  Q: What’s new and different in Bigdaddy?  A: It has some new infrastructure, not just better algorithms or different data. Most of the changes are under the hood, enough so that an average user might not even notice any difference in this iteration.  Q: What else can you tell me about Bigdaddy?  A: In my opinion, this data center improves in several of the ways that you’d measure a search engine. But for now, the main feedback we’re looking for is just general quality and canonicalization
Researchers at The Australian National University have a plasma engine to provide spacecraft with thrust. Their design was recently verified by the European Space Agency and will go into full-scale testing next year.
I thought it was funny...
Yeah there's no WAY Courtney Love is that smart. Then again, she did get away with two murders.
One thing that hasn't been discussed is the advantages of a filesystem that can't be accomplished with full text searching.  Most significantly, you may not remember the text of your article but you may remember where in a hierarchy that document was.  E.g., if you're looking for all the documents and images from a certain course you took, the best way to look for them may be in a folder dedicated to that course in a "courses" parent folder.  A dual approach of a hierarchical system and full text search would seem to be a better approach.
If you like that, you'll like this (previously posted): http://www.aaronkoblin.com/work/faa/
The article writer mentioned that an Intel Powerbook is unlikely, since the Pro apps are not universial binary.  However, what is to stop them from releasing the new Powerbook and new universal binary Pro apps?  Especially since the word on the street is that they have been working to port the pro apps for the last year (yes, before the Intel announcement). But I still think that it is unlikely that they will announce an Intel powerbook.
http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0471383562
how 'bout a link from more recently than 2000?
this guy is smart smart smart and writes in a fantastic way that really gets me thinking about things...i'm going to read all the rest of his posts too.
11) Use valgrind! This tool alone can change the quality of your  code too much. http://valgrind.org/
About time someone said this
I agree. Like his stuff
I got 3339. i did the same thing i did before, but i think i made an error the first time. either that or this game does not have reproducable results.
Is it just me that feels like I know less the older I get then?
Also cool are graphs of how many planes are in the air on the same site:  http://flightaware.com/
how about not turning reddit into links to old JoS articles. Go to the web site and read the archives, don't post them here.
I don't think they're the next Google, either. But they *are* doing some things very well. I think it takes hard work to make something that's very simple but useful. Their products match that description. Basecamp, by the way, sure wasn't built in a day. Also, Rails does have some really good ideas.
Is it the facts make you uneasy?  your "hurhurhur" sounds like   Butthead's inane laugh at the back of the classroom.
The best information I've seen about being interviewed is from  the book "Ask the Headhunter: Reinventing the Interview to Win the Job" -- http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0452278015
I think it may be more appropriate to compare them to flickr or  del.icio.us.  Rails is fantastic, and I like their other apps.  But Google took something that basically didn't work before (search engines) and improved search by several orders of magnitude, creating a business model for the web at the same time.  I think 37signals' message of less-is-more is powerful and will spread to other applications, but I don't see them changing the world in the same way Google did.
I got 1880. With planning, the best I could do was ~1000
Michael Lewis is an amazing writer.
Have we got any maths heads here? Is this group theory or something at work?
Chaos!  Emergent phenomenon!  Cool!
After the introduction about "what makes weblog posts popular?", I can't figure out if this article is serious or if he's intentionally pandering to all the Reddit memes out there.  In one article we've got Paul Graham, Reddit meta-analysis, Startup School, Lisp, Ruby on Rails, Macintosh, Joel Spolsky, Richard Feynmann, Paul Graham again, and Thomas Bayes.  Slow down dude, give us time to breathe!
Why would you announce higher iTunes prices publicly? That would be kind of a downer.
None of those seemed likely to me.
This article was written by the cousin of the head of the Department of Homeland Security. When the author (Benjamin Chertoff) was asked about this relationship with the him(Michael Chertoff), he claimed he didn't know that was his cousin.  Anyway, if there was some sort of coverup about 9/11 this guy wouldnt be someone on the list of trusty debunkers...
dupe 
For some reason, I feel compelled to disagree with this lifehack...
I agree about the Reddit memes. It may be a year or two before the hyper-enthusiasts leave the building or maybe Reddit will get bought before that ;-)
painfully obvious
the law of unintended consequences strikes again
The purpose of seeking VC should not only be to get rich. If you create a company that ultimately employs a large number of people, then you've created wealth beyond your own bank account. Getting rich may be good for motivation, but the results also benefit our economy and standard of living. Think small and stay small; help yourself and perhaps a few others. Think big and risk all. If you succeed, we all win.
Link directly to the story instead of to TechDirt
&gt; First, a personal note. I'm feeling fully engaged. You know that feeling, when it seems like what you're working on occupies 100% of your attention, when you have to fight to think about anything else. I love this feeling.  I was feeling fully engaged on New Year's Eve.  I spent the whole afternoon writing down ideas.  I was alone in my apartment and felt like my head was going to explode from the intense feeling.  Unfortunately hunger plucked me out of the "engaged mode" and a friend's party kept me out of it for most of the night.  Maybe I should have gone grocery shopping the day before and skipped the party.  Anyway, now I've got a notebook full of stuff that will take months to research. :)
Whats up with the big hairy guys into guys
That guy is the best cartoonist ever.
Cuba, where most of the dissidents are in jail and the currency gets revalued by fiat, is less corrupt than South Korea, South Africa, Greece, and the Czech Republic.  Utter Crap.
Ok, but... is it real?
I saw NO argument at all. Only scare pictures. Stupid! All who drive takes a risk. Should they all be executed? 
But there is a monumental difference between driving, and driving after drinking.  I think cars are insanely dangerous anyway. They should all be made of plastic and go no more than 25 miles an hour. Thats plenty to take the kids to school and pick up the shopping. And once people can't do long distance journeys in their cars, public transport will take up the slack, get cheaper, more effecient, more regular, and pleasanter.   The problem is people feel there is an inalienable human right to operate extremely dangerous machinery in the name of convenience, and will fight tooth and nail to protect it.
I havn't served in army, so please explain
Michael Crichton should shut his mouth and stick to writing bad books. What really struck me about his lecture is the similarity between many of the examples he gives and what he is doing himself: playing off of uninformed hype to enrich/empower oneself. Despite the footnotes he is either uninformed or a liar. His whole idea of complex and linear systems is incorrect.   Two examples he gives of linear systems (a rocket and a cannonball) are in fact non-linear. Linear systems are proportional (if the input is changed the output changes by a proportional ammount) and additive (the output in response to the sum of two inputs is exactly the sum of the outputs in response to the inputs individually). Ojects moving in a gravitational field do not meet these requirements even if you ignore friction. Dip into high-school physics, pull out the basic equations for kinetic and potential energy, and consider the relationship between initial velocity and height reached by the cannonball. If you can't see the non-linearity there perhaps you should go buy one of Crichton's books... Enough beating a dead horse. What he is really talking about seems to be non-deterministic systems, which aren't as unpredictable as he wants. If it weren't possible to predict to some degree of accuracy the behavior of non-deterministic systems we could achieve nothing. He seems to demand total predictability which is a real jack-a$$ thing to do, right along the lines of the creationists (ID'ers). He contends that complex systems can only be managed. Management requires some ability to expect a result from a cetain action, which is prediction. So by his argument, since complex systems can't be predicted, and management requires prediction, management of complex systems is impossible. Does he even think this stuff through? Although to be fair, his idea of management and predictions are probably different. He also seems to be engaging in some intellectual dishonesty by showing the headline and first few words of the Independent's "Future of the Earth" article and implying that the article is an example of people playing on fear. From the way it starts I wager that the article is actually along the lines of his argument, not an actual fear-mongering piece. I can't verify since the Independent wants a Pound to purchase the article... Another thing, doctors, especially MD's are not scientists automaticaly. They are technicians who apply the findings of science. Some doctors are scientists, they do research. The rest are like mechanics, they try to figure out a problem and fix it (at a gross level), not experiment to find explanations for the problem. Oversimplifying here: there is some cross-over between general practice medicine and the practice of science, the same can be said of mechanics. However, having an MD, PhD, or an ASE certification doesn't mean you know crap about an unrelated field. I could go on all night.
It has already been demonstrated that terrorist advertising doesn't work. Those who drive drunk will think "this will never happen to me anyway".
Could it be real? Is it ok if it *could* be real?
So someone beautiful becoming hideous after a car accident is a stronger argument then someone dying... Hmmm...
I served in an army, and it is not obvious to me.
Has it really? Can you point me to the study that demonstrates this? I always thought that advertising of this nature was very effective. Similar ones relating to smoking have put me off cigarettes.
It's easy to point out that advertising like this doesn't work 100% of the time.  Sure people will see this and still drink and drive.  But, it's a lot harder to track how many see it and either swear off drinking and driving, keep friends from doing so, or even just drive drunk less frequently... Also, I'd say it isn't so much that "becoming hideous is a stronger argument than dying," as much as it is that the shock-value of the message sticks with the viewer more strongly.  For me, I have been exposed to death so much in the media, that seeing another pretty (or average or ugly) face who has died barely gets my attention (sad to say).  This, on the other hand, is the raw reality of what can come of the foolishness that is driving drunk, presented in a way I can't ignore.
I think a physical approach is more suited. This seems like an example of some sort of Ising System with "nearest neighbour interaction". And indeed, like physical systems that have this kind of interaction (e.g. ferromagnets), it eventually gives rise to adjecent areas with all units pointing in the same direction.  Check this out to see what I'm talking about:  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ising_model  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Magnetic_domain#Physical_origin   
Not so much more exciting as more random.  When a team can win by scoring only once, it's more likely for a team to win on a fluke play.  This much less likely in football and the modern hockey game, and impossible in basketball, where a winning team must score at least 30 times.
Dying happens to everyone. Before that, you'll have some good and some miserable time, and the "poursuit of happyness" stuff is about trying to get more of the former than of the latter.  Killing someone is stopping the show. Turning her life into permanent physical and psychological intense suffering, turning her into a impotent being that causes horror to everyone, especially her beloved ones, without hope for any significant improvement ever, is letting it go only for worse.  I know it's not PC to say that not every life ought to be lived, but would you argue that removing bad times from one's life while keeping all of the good ones isn't a good thing? In her case, that would have been simple to achieve: let her die on that day, as she'll probably never any significant good time anymore. Moreover, death being something unavoidable in the long term, we came to be more or less used to it, and we can sort of cope with the idea. Quite fortunately, we aren't used to what happened to her, we're still fresh to this kind of horror, and we better realize its terrible nature So yes, I think that what happened to her is far worse than death, that it is normal that it causes much more horror than the death of, say, her carmates, and that it IS a much stronger argument than someone dying.   
From the page I linked to there is a link to the PDF of the report the list was gleaned from. It states: 1. What is the Corruption Perceptions Index?  The TI Corruption Perceptions Index (CPI) ranks countries in terms of the degree to which corruption is  perceived to exist among public officials and politicians. It is a composite index, drawing on corruptionrelated  data in expert surveys carried out by a variety of reputable institutions. It reflects the views of  business people and analysts from around the world, including experts who are locals in the countries  evaluated. On the site I linked to, they already describe in detail how difficult it is to gather information on corruption under question 5: 5. Can the costs of corruption be quantified?  The short answer is "no". Some experts use regression analyses and other empirical methods in order to try to put a dollar figure on the cost of corruption. It is virtually impossible, though, since payments of bribes are not publicly recorded. No one knows exactly how much money is being "invested" in corrupt officials annually. And bribes do not take only monetary form: favours, services, presents and so on are just as common. At most, one can research the correlation between the level of corruption and, say, democratisation, economic development or environmental degradation.The social costs of corruption are even less quantifiable. No one knows how much the loss of an energetic entrepreneur or an acclaimed scientist costs a country. Moreover, any estimated social costs in dollars would be inadequate to the task of measuring the human tragedy behind resignation, illiteracy, or inadequate medical care. A general scepticism vis-à-vis any attempt at quantifying the costs of corruption is thus warranted.The following example illustrates the dilemma of pressing the issue into facts and figures:  A power plant is being built somewhere in the world, at a cost of US$ 100 million. It could be argued that - were it not for corruption - the cost could have been as low as US$ 80 million. The financial damage to the public would then be US$ 20 million. In practice, quite often projects are planned simply so that those involved can make huge private profits. Assuming that the power plant was superfluous, the financial damage would have to be assessed at US$ 100 million. Yet no major construction project leaves the environment untouched. The results may be: increased pollution, a lowering of land prices, resettlement of local residents, an increased debt burden for the country, etc. This calculation - probably closest to reality - is immensely complex. On a global scale, it seems almost impossible. But even if one were able to calculate the environmental damage, the increase of the debt burden and other factors, how would one measure the erosion of public confidence and the deterioration of a government's legitimacy, which are the direct result of corruption? In my perception, you've taken a defensive stance against this data since it triggered your bogometer. However, the site I linked to fully described the potential for bogus data and stresses the difficulty you're concerned about. Whether the actual list is useful or not, it certainly got me to read their site to see how they came up with the data and now I find myself understanding corruption a bit more. That's kinda useful to me.
little argument indeed. OTOH, is it targetted toward people who are really argument-sensitive?
oh my god. i loathe this kind of hit-you-over-the-head style preaching. it doesn't even give any details on how drunk the driver was, etc. if this becomes a hit on reddit i'm going to be pissed.
Damn.  This should have been headlined better.  Connotea is in fact del.icio.us for adademic references.  By the Nature group.  Brilliant.
it seems that you DO drink and drive.
We're still animals, with a survival instinct often so strong that we couldn't find the force to terminate ourselves, althought there's no hope for anything worth it in our future. Wishing one were dead is one thing. Finding the mental force to act accordingly to your will and reason, rather than obey your instincts, is another. Which is often not a bad thing: many people will, at a time or another in their lives, wrongly estimate that they're doomed, and they're saved by their programmed "cowardise" toward suicide. Besides, in the case discussed here, when you're impotent, almost limbless, and permanently high with the strongest painkillers medicine can provide, there are technical barriers to commiting suicide.
Yes. There does seem to be some slightly hairy analysis. Does anyone know of a good analysis textbook? Not just an introduction, but a full course.
I am not interested in "made up" news, thankyou very much! Someone from the Bush camp could write a series of letters from a "grateful Iraqi who is overjoyed to be free", or something along those lines.  Maybe that "could be real" too?   Once you leave the realm of reality, it's just not 'news' anymore.  It may have some value, but that value is different.
If there's one thing Walker hates.... it's a bigot.
I had the same thought, and was surprised to find folks here wondering. It certainly doesn't reflect the demeanor of the one Marine I know. (Disclaimer: I see the world though a pro-war lens.)
Inventors of the CCD, from Bell Labs
Sorry for the self-promotion, but I think this is a message more people need to see (although most likely not the people who read reddit...?).  It's a minor annoyance, but it is annoying nonetheless.
The little banner he complains about appears on the Guardian web page linked for the Steve Jobs keynote story.
I like it anyways
Link doesn't seem to be working...  Edit: Nevermind...
Better coverage in Wired: http://www.wired.com/news/technology/0,69946-0.html
If the mailing list is served via GMane, too. Otherwise one has to register again. And again another password ...  
I spent 12 years hanging around Marine aviators and Naval Aviators (I was an intelligence officer).  I know those guys and how they talk and deal with things. That letter is a pile of crap.
I don't think it is at all affective to those who would be likely to Drink &amp; Drive.   In my younger days anyone I knew who would of driven drunk  "didn't think it would happen to me",  and it didn't so their thoughts were reinforced. On the other hand,  when they knew Drunk Driving police checkstops were on the road it definitely changed behaviour and caused them to be more responsible. 
I wonder how long it will take before I will forget this image.  That poor girl . . . no words can convey the agony she must experience every minute for the rest of her life. . .  Can anyone imagine the incredible guilt the drunk driver has to live with as a result of his one moment of stupidity?  If I had caused such damage to someone else, I would either have to kill myself or build up some seriously weird psychological defense, and go crazy in the process. I barely qualify as a social sipper, but yes, this would make me fight harder to stop someone else from driving after drinking.  That poor girl . . . 
Reads like a 10 year old wrote it.
Too true.  There is always a percentage of the population that think the bad things will always happen to someone else.  However, not all people are quite that stupid. I have avoided many of the bad situations which have befallen my friends, simply because I *expect* bad things to happen, and so consequently I make a conscious effort to avoid high-risk situations.
Then again, my life is boring :/
yeah but wired has too many ads
&gt; "Sir, I've been in the tube for the last 10 hours, the weather was shit, and I haven't seen my wife in 2 weeks, can I work on this tomorrow?" That is the most telling line in the entire letter. Marines know they can't make stupid excuses like "the weather is bad", "I haven't seen my wife in awhile". You don't ask your superior to do something the next day. I have a friend in the Marines. Its not like this letter is trying to make it out to be at all. Nice BS.
that was fucking stupid.  'following the rules of book length' blah blah blah  graphic novels don't follow your rules  so you tossed out tons of stuff  and put in a bunch of new crap.  all-time lists shouldn't have stuff in the last 5-10 years
I disagree, since if you fail with VC, we all fail. Do whatever maximizes your companies' expected value, without regard for potential employees...The laws economics will see to it that your greedy decisions also are optimal for society at large. (I'm only referring to the decision of whether or not to accept VC here...in most situations economic theory doesn't match reality so clearly.)
Funny Stuff
It's not an argument, just an example.  How drunk was the driver in question?  What were the circumstances of the incident? Moreover, what percentage of accidents are due to alcohol (honestly due--the current figures are reputedly very loose; e.g. striking a drunk 'cause one was talking on one's cell phone counts as an alcohol-related injury or death)? Yes, this was a truly terrible incident.  Terrible incidents happen all the time--arms are removed in threshing machines, men die in industrial accidents and so forth.  The question is what is a reasonable and prudent way to reduce the frequency of terrible incidents.  Here in Colorado the limit is .05--not IMHO a reasonable or prudent limit.  Sure, anyone with a .2 BAC has too much; probably .1 is pretty bad as well.  But .01, like MADD wish to drop it to?
No that CAN'T be a joke.....
Is there a link that originates from O'Reilly anywhere?
It's crazy how little they hide their greed, in fact they brag about it:  &gt;"I've never heard a teenager complain about PQ [picture quality]," one movie chain executive said. "If they find it too dark, they still have the concession stand." When the situation becomes too bad at movie theaters Im sure some enterprising new theaters will spring up that want to provide a good movie watching environment (but there are probably problems with licensing films).  More likely the movie theaters will just hire good PR agents in the future instead of bragging about how successful they are at taking your money.
But "Dark Knight Returns" and "Watchmen" are both older then 5-10 years (1986) and they are 2 of the best all time graphic novels.
I've never understood why anyone would listen to O'Reilly twice.
I wish I could give this two points up! Great set of logos. Thanks, guys!
You say smart things, and in a clear way too. I stand corrected.
urge?  thats a terrible name
Since I don't trust the government, I do tend to believe comments such as yours.  However, a citation would be nice, although I'm guilty of not listing source as well.
http://911research.wtc7.net/talks/wtc/index.html http://911research.wtc7.net/index.html http://911research.wtc7.net/talks/wtc/slides.html Has some excellent information as well.  WARNING:  This website is huge, and well documented! 
no matter how long i stare, it never blinks
An ethnocentric garbagy list from a waste of wood pulp of a magazine.
maybe you have gif animation turned off
Walled garden and based on the previously debunked LA Times speculation.
These keynotes, in my opinion, are how Steve Jobs saved Apple.
The problem is that I don't know enough about the subject to know if it /could/ be real...if I did know enough, that letter wouldn't mean that much to me. I would be okay with it being fake if large numbers of experts on modern-day marines (whoever they would be) could first convince me they were unbiased experts and then convince me that that letter is realistic...seeing as that is unlikely, I want to know it is true.
The problem is that I don't know enough about the subject to know if it /could/ be real...if I did know enough, that letter wouldn't mean that much to me. I would be okay with it being fake if large numbers of experts on modern-day marines (whoever they would be) could first convince me they were unbiased experts and then convince me that that letter is realistic...seeing as that is unlikely, I want to know it is true.
If you boil the bark of a willow tree, you will get the chemical also known as aspirin.  If you then let this chemical decompose further (which *must* be done in a lab), you will get a commercial product used for smoothing the skin after shaving (forget the product name, it's a specialty spa product.) There was an article not too long ago about a plant somewhere in Africa which is used by hunters to drastically reduce hunger while on hunting trips.  It is now illegal to export this plant; meanwhile a pharmacutical company is trying to isolate the exact chemical that reduces hunger.  It has a two part name, first part sounds like *hoodie*.  Dang my horrible memory! Homopathy works, in other words!
If you boil the bark of a willow tree, you get aspirin. Homopathy works!
the NSA spying story and its coverage gets curiouser and curiouser
Heh. I can't testify to the veracity of the post, but the toilet paper part of the story is NOT unbelievable. As a veteran of a so-called "sane" military branch (the Air Force), let me tell you that pressure from above can easily turn a "can-do" attitude into stunningly bullheaded stupidity. Remember, you have the Secreatary of Defense chiding his own soldiers that "You go to war with the army you have, not the army you wish you had". Every general officer in uniform read that as "Do the job. Get it done." What branch of the military did you serve in faust? My time in was all during peacetime, except for some dumbass sabre rattling by the North Koreans. I'm willing to bet the military of the last few years is an entirely different ballgame. When you're not making war, sweating the details makes you readier for war. It's how you're judged. I bet the rules change a bit when there's actually a war.
"Absurd" doesn't cut it.  I think these labels are tragic and humorous because each of them has a story.
Yuk
I think I like the new one better. :)
I like things from boingboing, but I do not approve of taking postings directly from boingboing itself.  Cool read, but I had to vote it down for that reason.  I'll down-vote everything else which comes directly from bb.
this "essay" is as lame as a centipede with every leg broken.
What kind of disgusting shit is this? Really, I don't expect to find links at reddit to:  a) hardcore pornography  b) pornography  c) pictures of mutilated people  d) gross content (okay, so this is subjective, so what?) Basically, if you don't want your kid sister to read it, don't post it! Don't try to emotionally bully people, shit like this does the world no good. And if you HAVE TO POST IT, add a tag saying "NSFW" or "DISGUSTING" or "MUTILATION" or "IMASICKBASTARD". Thank you
Denied, already. Check Slashdot's latest Slashback.
Its an interesting story but it should point to the original link on wired and also the author is not a hacker but a tech writer therefore he did not rewrite the software himself but volunteered to be a guinea pig for the guys who know this stuff. So - the posting is misleading but the actual story is quite good.
I love the propoganda posters...they are awesome. I just love Reddit. Such a great site.
As funny as they are, I think they are actually great reasons why Americans *should* travel.
These 2 companies are only alike in the sense that they deal with bookmarks. The great thing about delicious is the tags, which also foster a much better and more interesting "discovery" of new stuff. Blink didn't do that. It was just a backup service. The FF extension for delicious is also a big reason its successful.
would be useful when fully operational.
That's not economic law. That's neoliberalist theory. 
Python being used by microsoft and google is yuk? Are you one of those lispers :-)
Frankly impossible to assess its validity.  If sourced, an interesting commentary.
Hmm... some of these remind me of  http://reddit.com/info?id=20766
Funny.  I suppose there's no explaining away "do not eat toner," but I do feel for the candle manufactuer who warned, “DO NOT use soft wax as ear plugs or for any other function that involves insertion into a body cavity.”   If you spend any time in a US health food store or co-op, you're likely to find plenty of products for "ear candling,"  a common grooming fetish of alternative medicine afficianados.  Alas! See http://www.quackwatch.org/01QuackeryRelatedTopics/candling.html
i voted it down since the original one was posted 8hrs early so its a repost.
Most drunk drivers do not cause any accident.  Executing them would be a much larger tragedy than the less frequent damage they cause. The title is good evidence of the sense of theatre of the poster, or their lack of judgement, or both. Most car accidents do not involve alcohol.  My understanding is that excessive speed is a implicated more often.  Other issues are inattention (stereos, phones), fatigue, inexperience, poor judgement, other drugs etc. If this is an argument against drinking and driving, then it is an equally strong argument against driving at all. People make mistakes.  With cars those mistakes sometimes have high costs. Acceptance of cars involves acceptance of risk.  If the risk of occasionally drinking and driving is unacceptable then risks of driving is too. I don't drink drive.  I do occasionally exceed the posted speed limit, not stop completely at stop signs, listen to music, briefly answer the phone etc.  It's a personal choice not a moral absolute.  I should not be executed and neither should any other person. 
Agreed about the toilet paper story.  I work for a "top 50" U.S. environmental engineering firm, and just the other day I bought a box of .07mm mechanical pencils because our office didn't purchase any.  I think these sorts of things happen in any large organisation... However, this story is an obvious hoax.  Did somebody forget this is CraigsList?!?
Yes, the testimony is great too. Very funny.
The zombie dogs thing is a jab at digg, no?
Cut away *The Reality Distortion Field* and even Apple's unique subculture, and you are left with the fact that Jobs is an excellent public speaker, period. My question would be whether this is a God-given talent or a skill he has improved with time.  While I think that the best public speakers are naturals, I'm firmly of the opinion that watching other people refine and improve their homiletics mean most of us mere mortals haven't tried hard enough.
That applies to pretty much everything, actually.
What a joke. Google is ripping Microsoft's talented workers away, owning the web, and has a much more positive image. Google is releasing new products. Google is also a software company with a philosophy that is tangential--if not opposite--that of Microsoft's. No, it's not "don't be evil". Google wants to index the world while Microsoft claims to want to allow its users to index the world (according to a recent interview). But Google is the “great indexer”…. And THEY don’t use Microsoft. If nothing else, it’s an embarrassment. Google is an up-and-coming company   with lots of money, respect, and a voracious appetite for what might have been considered Microsoft’s turf. So how is Google not the prime threat?  Note: I don’t hear Balmer throwing chairs in his office and screaming, “I’M GONNA !#@! KILL IBM.” 
In the US.
repost:  http://reddit.com/goto?id=23112
How you can you say that her life is worse than death?  How can you say that her life is not worth living?  Do you know her??? She has endured horrific pain and agony in order to LIVE. She is a human being and a courageous survivor.  To me, that is beautiful.
C'mon Apple! Wow us :)
I think this article/headline goes too far - sure, they want popcorn sales, but having a bad plot means fewer people returning to the movies/fewer recommendations to go to the movies, which is not worth it for the small amount of extra popcorn money. Plus, tickets nowadays are between $8 and $10 - 50% of that is $4-$5 per person, more than you're going to get for popcorn. I think the writer of this article is just looking to stir up trouble.
Zombie dogs was one of the first submissions ever on reddit. http://reddit.com/info?id=144
Is there any way to ensure that these guys are legit? A link to a financial story saying that optoutprescreen is really a joint venture of the credit agencies would be nice. Or even a link from the Equifax or Verisign web sites.
Ahhhh, if only. I have grave doubts.
why is writing the obvious so obvious?
This must be one of those new content-free articles.. it really says nothing.
duped 
those are good choices. the other 8 though???
Loved the story. Being able to 'hack' your own body is going to be the biggest thing since the Industrial revolution
I says IronPython will probably get 1.0 this year.
This is a bright side about the US, they publish all their stuff. You would never get such things in Germany.
don't you mean one of the *best* submissions ever on reddit?
I found a related post today: http://presentationzen.blogs.com/presentationzen/2005/11/the_zen_estheti.html
Nice article ... here's where I stand - 3 YES out of 10 1) Should the National Security Agency or CIA have the ability to monitor domestic phone calls or e-mails without obtaining judicial approval? YES 2) Should the government have the ability to hold an American citizen without charge, indefinitely, without access to a lawyer, if he is believed to be part of a terrorist cell? NO, NOT INDEFINITELY 3) Can you imagine a situation in which the government would be justified in waterboarding an American citizen? NO 4) Are there American journalists who should be investigated for possible treason? Should Sedition laws be re-introduced?   NO 5) Should the CIA be able to legally assassinate people in countries with which the U.S. is not at war? YES 6) Should anti-terrorism cops be given every single law-enforcement tool available in non-terrorist cases? YES 7) Should law enforcement be able to seize the property of a suspected (though not charged) American terrorist, and then sell it? NO 8) Should the U.S. military be tasked with enforcing domestic crime? NO 9) Should there be a national I.D. card, and should it be made available to law enforcement on demand? NO 10) Should a higher percentage of national security-related activities and documents be made classified, and kept from the eyes of the Congress, the courts, and the public? NO
Definitely one of the most _persistent_ early submissions on reddit.
I think this is pretty effective.  Even the most cautious of us might be tempted to drive home after, say, a couple of glasses of wine with a meal, if they don't feel an alcohol buzz, feeling confident that their reaction times remain unaffected.  Shocking material like this just makes the whole issue seem a bit more serious, rather than just "something which happens to other people".  Sure, there will always be people who just don't care all that much, but for those of us who would like to think of ourselves as reasonable, I think it will encourage that extra bit of caution.
&gt;&gt;Basically, if you don't want your kid sister to read it, don't post it! Maybe a good rule of thumb. However I certainly *do* would want my kid sister to read this (if I had one). As she may be in that age group that is very likely to make or influence a choice of drinking and driving.
I think Blizzard already made that game. And it runs on Macs.
yuk yuk! amurikins R st00pid
correct, he wrote nothing.  link: http://www.wired.com/wired/archive/13.11/bolero_pr.html
I'd say it's one of the _discussed_ early submissions on reddit. At least in Cambridge...
He didn't actually rewrite anything, still interesting though.
Impressive. Most superstring theory articles I've stumbled upon could be resumed by "It explains everything but it's verrrrrrrrry complicated, so don't go there, chum." This article manages to put (some) sense to this theory and about where it's going. That, my friends, is professionnal scientific journalism.
You won't be hacking your own body, you'll be running Microsoft Ear 3.1 or GNU Ear 0.2, wishing it could actually fit in the implant so you wouldn't have to carry a more powerful computer on your belt everywhere you go, and hoping it doesn't crash again.
This reminds me of the images of people in New Orleans getting supplies from the store. The white people were getting supplies and the black people were looting according to the media. Very sad when stuff is manipulated like that.
Excellent !!!
If popcorn is where the money is, theaters will eventually push studios to make movies with natural breaks in them -- they'll bring back intermissions.
cool info
Actually, most fatal or serious accidents do involve some alcohol, at least according to Australian statistics. The American lax attitude to drink driving coupled with the oversize cars would presumably make things much worse over there.
Yeah I think his punishment is self evident. He will never live it down, never really have a fulfilling life. Even if instead of going to prison, he became wealthy and successful, I don't think he would still ever truly be happy. Thats punishment.
Turn off the images and READ the web page. It's not preachy in the least. I find it to be, considering the subject, a marvel of restraint. It seems that the histrionics of the submitter has poisoned your mind.
WalMart online shoppers who buy the Planet of the Apes DVD set are shown similar items available for purchase. Among these are documentaries on the life of Martin Luther King, Jr., boxer Jack Johnson, and Tina Turner. I am not sure how these items are similar, but it sure is offensive.
Although I can see that the dialogue going on here is all over the map on whether the SITE is effective or not (with typical web simplification of the issues to the point of silliness - for example, what is effective with an 18 year old occasional drinker may not be for a 50 year old alcoholic) there doesn't seem to be as much dialogue about the title it was posted under.  "Execute Drunk Drivers On The Spot". ... Okay, so someone does this ONCE. Under intense peer pressure. At age 16 (underage drinker...)... So we kill them on the spot? This is knee jerk stupidity. I lost one of my best friends to a repeat drunk driver and I NEVER made any comment about her life being taken. Neither did his parents.   But lets take this one step farther. So what about people who drive dangerously because they have a cell phone in one hand, a coffee in the other, and are changing lanes? What about people who speed because they are late to miss the school bus? What about people who speed to get to a doctors appointment? FAR MORE PEOPLE are killed by speeders than by drunks. FAR MORE PEOPLE are killed because of driver distraction caused by cell phones than by drunks.  I'm all for heavy ads, because I DO think they will reach a subset of the drunk-driving-population. And I'm for stiff penalties. How about 'you kill someone in an accident, you lose your license for life.' But kill the person? That just compounds the tragedy. Even drunk drivers have kids, and redeeming features, and....  Sorry, I guess that doesn't fit with the posters simplistic vision of humanity and quest for vengeance for something he has probably never personally experienced - loss of someone to a stupid idiot drunk out of their mind.
"Kill all that do not believe in me"  So sayth the Flying Spagetti Monster.
I don't see how this impugns (sp?) Americans more than stupid people in general. Funny though. Reminds me why I got out of system administration...users, ack
How can anyone claim that 'all Marines speak a certain way'?  Just because a particular groups gets a regimented training doesn't mean their English skills are going to take on a particular characteristic.
In all fairness, maybe the dog needs it more - *at least* the nine year old is smarter than the dog.  Maybe the five year old, too. Certainly not the parents, though.
Here's an *actual* Chuck Norris fact: He's a hyperchristian evangelical Bush supporter.
Wow, cool, they use Rivet ( http://tcl.apache.org/rivet/ ), which I had a hand in writing:-)
There is at least one piece of total BS in here.  He says:  "...what happened in the Bay area and Silicon Valley after the dot-com boom: Million-dollar condos were abandoned. Million-dollar homes were abandoned." Um, no.  The real estate market continued to climb.  Even the paper millionaire who bought houses they suddenly couldn't afford didn't abandon them after the bust because their houses had appreciated.   Generally good analysis, though.
He not only didn't re-write anything, but he didn't write anything, nor was he a hacker.  The guy went from lab to lab until he could hear certain key tunes of the song. This is a great article.  It's a shame not everyone who is deaf is eligible for this type of thing.
dupe!
"Apple does not trust a 3rd party to develop a music store for the iPod." I hadn't actually thought of this. Licensing out AAC could dilute the brand, huh?
Google uses .NET?
companies that raise chickens said Thursday they will test *every* flock for bird flu before the birds are slaughtered.
Apparently they did, at least for Orkut.  Chris Sacca talked about it, and said that it turned out not to scale well enough, at Startup School.  I think they tried it because they figured C# was a better java, which it is widely reputed to be.
Don't forgot PopUp-Blocker software to stop the ads that play inside your head everytime the icecream truck drives by... "You like icecream.  You love it.  Your life is meaningless without icecream.  You like icecream..."
Yeah! And the government should be able to arrest us for using our cell phones while driving too.  Seriously, some kid could crash while sending a text message.  An outright ban combined with intensive government monitoring at all traffic lights should solve the problem.
This is not disgusting.  This is a living human being who has had to overcome enormous challenges.  You ought to visit a hospital sometime. If this was your daughter, would you call her disgusting?
I don't drive and I try not to ride in cars.  Busses, trains, and airplanes are much safer.  I used to ride my bicycle a lot but then a stupid kid nearly ran over me with his sports car.  Now I never ride on main streets, even if they have bicycle lanes. Some things you can forgo for better health and longer life:   * smoking   * soft drinks   * food made with enriched flour   * driving and riding in personal vehicles   * IRC   * alcohol   * candy and refined sugar   * computer games
that's just too clever.
This appears to send all trafic through their servers.. That takes away nearly all the advantages of using ssh!! Better to use a java applet for this. Are there any other ways?
I love how there's one at the bottom of the first page (at the moment, at least), with the picture of the camera box
yeah, elections in ohio weren't rigged. sure. uh-huh.
they only mention prices fixed below market value. what about above? the gas companies have been fixing prices above the market value for quite some time.
it's not always the first shot, since you can reset the counter on some cameras. More info here: http://www.engadget.com/2004/09/30/fun-google-hack-with-sony-digital-cameras/
Yeah, herdrick is right -- prices did nothing but climb monotonically in the Bay Area. I couldn't bring myself to read the article with him saying things like that and, "I predicted the Dot Com Bubble Burst, I was just three years early."   Dork. 
looks hot
dupe
The tone of the article suggests she never had the hearts or minds of the folks at Der Spiegel.
Of course there is. There are people who let it drive their life to various degrees.  There are also people who try to drive the lives of others due to it, to various degrees.  If you don't like me referring to the most extreme, in those respects, using an intensive modifier, that's fine with me.
This Google hack is cool not only because it is interesting to see the first picture taken out of the box (or after a reset), but also because a lot of those things link to indexes of pictures which the public probably isn't meant to see.
Maybe it's possible to write a crawler that gets many first shots,  there is an EXIF header inside that tells you the date/time, this is a  raw guess of the date the camera was purchased. In the EXIF there is  also the camera model. Having this two info you can trace graphs with lines of different color for different camera models and see the commercial  success of different cameras, release date, peaks. Should be interesting to see,  but I'm too lazy and busy to try :)
no worky!
I love the first one !!!! sad and true
There's a good reason for this: the revised body count broke at 3 AM, much too late to take a new picture for the front page, and after most papers had already finished printing. It's not manipulation-- it's just honestly trying to get the newspaper out on time without a big blank spot on the front page.
Yesssss!
Fascinating, and not something you hear much about...
Hmm...even after doing this, the resulting routines are not reentrant, hence not really apppropriate for use in a library...but then again, the Standard C Library shares this characteristic. I can't help but think that this is much easier in a language with instance variables or closures... Don't get me wrong. I'm a big fan of C. I'm just thinking that if you want to program in C, you should program in C; and if you want to escape C's limitations, you're better off using a different language, rather than jumping through hoops. An interesting exercise nonetheless.
So you've labeled my argument but not refuted it. And I think I made it pretty clear that I'm not a neoliberalist. (in fact I'm member of the green party) But I do believe that econ applies in some cases, such as this one.
Appears very busy -about one comment every few seconds....  No registration requred - so far....
I've had the good fortune of being able to set up interviews with staffers of Reddit, Technorati, and Psylock.  Before I ask them questions, I'd like your input - what do you want to know about these interesting projects?
reddit: what are possible future features?
Maybe this guy should have used PowerPoint to prove his point instead of a long and boring block of text.
Only if the other car is smaller.  Think about it like this: whats more dangerous: a crowd walking slowly down a street, gently bumping into each other (no protection) or a phalanx (?) of tanks slamming into each other in a field in France.
This article is sorely lacking in good information.
As a total claustrophobe, I be riding Lufthansa anytime soon. Trapped in an airline seat? Brrr.
it's a joke because the "lisp" tag on the maelstrom is *really* small
Boy, I'm glad I don't have that job right now. I'm not in the habit of defending UberMegaCorps, but I have to say, this quote is ridiculous: "'Wal-Mart must not only explain how this could possibly happen, but owes all of America, especially African-Americans, an apology for what was either a racist joke or just incredibly bad judgment,' said Chris Kofinis, spokesman for Wake Up Wal-Mart, a campaign group run by the United Food and Commercial Workers union." OK, I'll admit that anything's possible, but a racist joke? Are we supposed to believe that a group of white supremacist (or at least incredibly tasteless and insensitive) programmers lurking within Wal-Mart's IT department deliberately skewed the recommendation system to produce this particular combination? I'd say this falls under the category of "extraordinary claims". And what does "bad judgement" have to do with it? The only "judgement" at work is that of an automated system working in a problem domain that was clearly beyond its abilities. Besides which, they already *did* explain, and *did* apologize -- profusely. So let's save the outrage for where it really belongs, please. Give the guys some credit for recognizing the problem and dealing with it quickly. 
Right now this is a rumor. Wait for the actual announcement before you decide whether this is "evil", or if it's even DRM at all.
Didn't the dot com bubble last something like 4 years? (from '96 to '00)  So saying you predicted it but you were just 3 years early means you would've missed most of the boom (had you acted accordingly). However, I do think that housing prices are due for a correction.  I can only see two beneficiaries of the current housing 'boom' : real estate agents, mortage brokers and local governments that base property taxes on a percentage of property value.  So what if my house has gone up in value by 50% in the last four years?  If I sold my house I'd still need someplace to live, so either: 1) I'd have to buy another house (which has also gone up at least by the same percentage meaning that I really can't capture the gain) or 2) I'd have to rent and because housing prices have gone up, so have rents (landlords need to cover those mortage payments). The article claims that rents haven't gone up, but certainly they have in some areas pricing low income people out of the rental market.  In areas where rents haven't gone up it might make sense to go for option 2 (sell and rent until the bubble pops) because you could perhaps capture some of the gain. So what real benefit have I gotten as a homeowner by rising real estate prices?  I pay more in property taxes now and other people around me who rent are paying more in rent (meaning they have less money to spend on other things).  It's the Real Estate agents who have played a big role in talking up this market.  Bring on the correction, lower prices will be good for those who don't yet own homes and they won't hurt those of us who have been in our homes for several years (it's going to hurt for those who have bought in the last couple of years, though; they'll have to consider it an expensive lesson in buying high and selling low).
cute as hell
How long before they start shipping Ruby.NET?
This's just heartbreaking.  Maybe it'd be better to put everyone in solitary and risk insanity than cause crap like the author described.
Can't really say much about at it this point. Would be kind of funny if he was preaching against it and then in his spare time doing it, but it still is very possible that truly was in the area preaching to people (especially if his church is focused on those people). Will be interesting to find out more details.
I don't see what this has to do with "the mainstream media."  All this proves is that in human beings crying normally indicates either extreme joy or extreme sadness.  -1.
Your papers, please!
What about a phalanx of tanks gently bumping into each other?
The tag maelstrom is missing its largest element: PAUL GRAHAM.
so if you are trapped in your seat, doesn't it violates some kind of safety measures? eg. how do you get out during emergency?
You forgot a few:  * Shoes that aren't Birkenstocks  * Works of fiction less than 100 years old  * Food not made from black beans, rice, tofu, or lentils 
Worldwide population management in the future?
Good checklist on what to take care of before starting up.
They are into private beta now.
Well, this is US-specific, so I can't judge too well, but one thing of the analysis seemed strange to me, and that's when he said that the normal situation is that rent is higher than mortgage payment. That's not, and has never been, the situation where I live (Spain) and it strikes me as a weird arrangement. When you're renting you're paying every month and don't get anything at the end, why would you pay more for less? If I were to choose whether to rent or mortgage and mortgaging were cheaper, what would be the advantage of renting that would justify me paying more? I just don't get this. 
Best line of the article: "I was set up."  Yes you were... and you got caught, dipshit.
There's nothing to refute since you didn't describe what you mean by 'we all fail', 'whatever maximises your companies expected value', or 'optimal for society'. I suspect there may be a 'beg the question' fallacy involved where agreeing with your idea of greedy decisions being optimal and disagreeing is a failure.
Um, rent is *always* higher than the mortage payment.  The difference is profit to the landowner.  If the landlord's payment to the bank (his mortgage payment) was lower than the tenant's rent, the landlord would make no profit, and would therefore have no incentive to rent the building.  The author is saying that during a housing market crash, the rent prices fall below what the landlord pays for his mortgage payment, and the landlord ends up owing more to the bank than the he gets in rent from the tenant. *Most* people rent instead of buy because they don't have enough money for a downpayment for a mortgage.   Maybe this is just a language misunderstanding?
She is physically disgusting, its a fact. That is the tragedy of the situation. Most people can accept the loss of hands, or legs. The problem for her, and I suspect she knows this, is that she will never be loved or desired by anyone. We are not built mentally to cope with this.
Flawed for a number of reasons.  For one, the difference could be length of experience with the differing languages.  It seems the Lisp-Java comparison was done around 1999/2000, at which point Lisp had existed for 40 years, and Java for 5.  Furthermore, different languages excel at different tasks, and this particular problem seems custom made for recursion a la lisp.
just what we need, a PHP evangelist at least the Lisp evangelists have a worthwhile product reminds me of joke that goes like this....  "why doesn't New Mexico have an NFL football team?  because if they did, then Arizona would want one too"
I'm probably missing something, but why aren't prisoners put in smaller, single cells instead of having to share?  They could still talk to each other through the bars.  Are prisoners allowed to run all over the jail?  How do they wind up having enough privacy to have sex in the first place?
Like most geeks I fantasize about working for google.  That said, if everything goes well for Google, or for another search company for that matter, the information we see (find) will be controlled in a large way by a private company. Motto or no Motto that's scary.  Now where's my tin-foil?
I didn't see any info concerning how these studies were conducted.  What assurance does anyone have that this organization is reliable?
i use it daily and i have no issues with it
Oh, not again poker servers. Is it the same guy or do all the poker server programmers try to piss off at least 2 language communities? 
Children are a huge amount of work, if your goal is happy, healthy kids.  Why do people bother having children if they are not prepared to care for them?
see this to understand the real secret of nature that a greek myth foretold and the secret to the universe
Haven't you heard? Adobe bought Macromedia just recently. If you go to their website (http://www.macromedia.com) you see a luvverly Adobe logo with the note nearby "formerly Macromedia". Now Adobe has absolutely *no* professional competition in professional 2D graphics space (I love Xara, but most people have never heard of it). Be afraid. Be very afraid... ;-)
i love the site
&gt; ... this particular problem seems custom made for recursion a la lisp. Did you skip the first paragraph? Lutz Prechelt created the problem for a C/C++ vs. Java comparison. Later Ron Garret (see  [1]) did a follow-up using the same problem. [1] &lt;http://www.flownet.com/ron/eg-rg-faq.html&gt;
Actually it's not a repost, it's just an other article in the same blog on the same subject...
wow, that's werry funney because it's just what YOU not should do. You see i know this internet-thing and that's NOT what RTFM stands for, laaal.
This article is valuable, if only for its insanely useful link to the Chuck Norris fact generator : http://www.4q.cc/chuck/index.php
As stated somewhere else, I reckon it isn't a politically correct statement. Among others, it goes against christian dogma, but eh, a couple of fine chaps like Galileo did, so I'm not ashamed to be in such a company. I don't know her, and I'm projecting some of my personnal views on her: that's exactly the purpose of her mediatization.  Maybe she's disgusted with life, maybe she spends her lifetime dreaming she was dead on that day, maybe she feels definitely lost for sane social interaction, for bearing and rising kids, surely her life is a permanent physical suffering, probably does she rightly bet that this suffering will only end with her death. Maybe she sees little purpose in her surviving, and has little hope to find such a purpose in the future. Or maybe she thinks that what she endures is God's will, that it has an Inneffable meaning, that demonstrating her outstanding courage is of crucial importance, maybe she loves her medicalised life, with it's suffering, horrors, etc. just as Job did on his manure heap.  I have as little (or as much) ground to claim the former as you have to claim the latter. I certainly wouldn't hold the same speach, had she personnaly taken part in the discussion, but here she's only a substrate, on which we grow a discussion or more general interest, so we don't have to care too much about betraying her philosophical stand, had she one.  However, I strongly disagree with your claim that "She has endured horrific pain and agony in order to LIVE". I've been living with an intensive care doctor, and I've got no illusion about who fights for survival: doctors do whatever it takes to keep people technically alive, with little to no consideration for the kind of life it might be. They give no opportunity to the patient to choose between life and death.  I would add that many doctors do it as a _Wille zur Macht_ move (http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nietzsche), which is awfully ungodly if you look at it from a religious standpoint, and cursed such prominent figures as Moses. Bottom line is: if you didn't make a conscious choice, then there is no courage involved. Nothing indicates that she ever had an opportunity to make a choice, and my experience with physicians makes me strongly believe that she never had one. A bit of philosophy/theology to finish. You write: "She is a human being and a courageous survivor. To me, that is beautiful". I've already written what I think of this courage. About her being a survivor, what does it mean? The end of her life is indeed slightly delayed (she's going to suffer skin cancers, immunodepressions, general bad health due to lack of physical activity, various other organic dysfunctions, and probably a lack of reasons to enjoy life, so don't expect her to live very old). I would find it beautiful if these years were put to use into something that surpasses her personnal life. Merely staying alive isn't exactly such a sublime thing, my dog would do the same. Your life's only worth what you make of it.  I really don't buy the "this is a beautiful proof of courage" thing: that's mumbo-jumbo repeated by religious people to cover how difficult it is to see God's will, in a world which has always seemed unfair, and where now humanity's power grows at such insane speed that most of theological views become obsolete instantaneous (a couple of decades _is_ instantaneous, for theology). What was God's will: the crash? Her survival? The conditions of this survival? Doctors being able and willing to maintains her alive? Why would this very high-tech, artificial, survival medical effort be godly, whereas, say, articifial fecundation or contraception would be ungodly? Can I remind you that until no-so-long ago, opening corpses to improve medical knowledge and power was considered as terribly ungodly, and would grant you death by burning? The whole standpoint of ethics (including religion) about survival has been blown by the pace of medical progress. It will take decades before we adapt our ethics to these new conditions. That won't be too much of a heartbreak for secular ethics; OTOH religious views which pretend to be eternal will suffer much more from that twist...   
There is no way to get evidence that fraudolent  clicks are originated from the adsense account  owner. If google closes every account target of  fraudolent clicks we have a nice attack against every  adsense user that is our enemy. This appears too stupid  right? Still, how do you get evidence about the source?  ADSL have dynamic IPs, Google should not try to match  the IP address of fraund with the one used to authenticate  to adsense. Well moreover who wants to fraund is smart  enough in most cases to use different IP addresses  that appear to be unrelated and not connected to the  original account. So I guess there is some truth in  this story...
I noticed the problem with his 3 year early prediction, too. I checked the NASDAQ index, which is a pretty good indicator of the tech market. If this guy had sold everything 3 years before March '00 and had somehow realized when the market hit rock bottom (October '02) and bought everything back he would have only broken even.
I'm not sure I understand why most geeks want to work with Google. It's a great company, but still it's a company  you are working for. To work for yourself can be much  more interesting, and there are always stuff to do  like interesting web services or other technologies that will  be overlooked by google and other big companies.
I agree with you. Google is showing a tendency of becoming the new MS. When a company gets so huge it loses its "innocence".
It's a fair point, but think of what you'd learn from the people that work their and the technology they use. Never mind the free haircuts and massages.
Actually you are right, I forgot to add one think:  if you found a startup, you have to make sure  to work with people as smart as you are, or smarter.  This way you will learn a lot too. In Google you may  learn things that you will hardly discover with  your hacker friends, but this stuff are often useful  if you have to handle a huge amount of information  like Google does. Not that it is not valuable, but  maybe working with your smart friends you can  learn much more about the art of programming. Even if  the environment is sane, I don't think at google  you can spend hours working together with your  friends exploring new programming abstractions, expecially  if you are at your early stage of hacking. Another  thing you probably can't do is to use Ruby or Scheme  or SmallTalk instead of Python (for some people this  can be a strong point). Last point, there is something very disturbing about  google: it's said they hire only PHDs. If this is  true, it is not the company with the philosophy  I may like to work for.
"You won't be hacking your own body" damn right, Hakz0rs from some Elite cr3w of pimply teenagers will.  Bring hole new meaning to the word bots, and DoS attack's, or worse a DDoS. Brain vision, from around the globe to your frontal lobe.
"But, in the main, demographic decline is the consequence of the low fertility that generally goes with growing prosperity" It may be true for the other countries, but here in Italy  there are other strong factors. Usually people start to  have economic independence *over* 30. After they  get this status, there is to wait for some more year in  order to have enough money to do the marriage party...  Of course it's still too early I guess, so they wait  a couple of years more to enjoy the marriage without  childs and be free... Make your math and guess how much  time is left to do childs!
If you read the first article (this was part two) you can see that he predicted that it would crash, as opposed to the people who predicted that it would go on forever (Dow going to 36k and that kind of statements). Predicting that the housing bubble will crash between now and five years is pretty relevant for any people that have mortgages with more then five years to go.
Sounds like it's actually a Windows CE machine, the only thing Commodore on it is the name, bought by some company in the Netherlands.
I dislike DRM as much as the next guy, but if you think Google could have cut any of the rumored content deals without having some sort of DRM, you're crazy.
A very interesting (but old) article. Look at how much has changed since then. Capital Cities who? Try Disney/ABC, and the whole Viacom tv/radio corporation. That being said, I only buy the broadcast TV/radio complaint. The broadcast stations should be responsible to have programming the viewers want/tolerate. I see plenty of competition in the magazine industry by separate owners competing for the same target audience.  I dont know enough about the newspapers but the only strange practices I have seen are between Washington Post/NYT and sometimes LA Times, but I dont think they share the same owners.  Any newer articles posted? and why does Reverend Moon own the Washington Times?
Prison is not about motivating people to follow the law, it is about reforming criminals. That said, it does motivate people to follow the law and it does not reform criminals. There are many many problems with the prison system, and its good to see an indepth article covering the issue. It is an issue often ignored because it is so hard to come to terms with.
I wonder if these patterns are different for prison populations in different parts of the world. Do other systems do a better job of dealing with it?
Man some people have way too much time on their hands.
I don't think I would use coroutines in C, but I think it is interesting to see how things are implemented in C to understand their use in other languages.
Microsoft takes care of its customers again... **not.**
Thats not always the case. You might want to own a property for some reason, and since you dont have lots and lots of cash, you get a mortage. Then you decide to help you out you charge rent. There are so many different reasons for owning and renting I don't think monthly profit is an absolute. Sure if you bought property specifically to rent it out at a profit, your rent is gonna be higher, but I think its more likely to be a long term investment rather then short term profit decision. (To get a mortage you have to put down thousands of dollars, you probably wont even recoup that from rent profit for a few years, even more true the more you put down)
Saw that coming.
from the article: "11 years. My wife is currently out a Wal Mart buying worthless plastic shit. She's 70 lbs overweight.  If it wasn't for the kids I would kick her fat ass to the curb."   
This is very concerning indeed. What is needed is similar applications with tighter access controls set by the maker of the profile. Its understandable that since the entire business models of these sites relies on them having as much info as possible about you for targeted advertising, these sites provide possibly the **most accurate** and **easiest to use** resource for mining information about groups of people. Fears of some NSA/ government conspiracies aside, the potential for abuse of these systems has already been proven. Private schools have gone apeshit in in the last year doing things like registering on facebook and looking for anything, even simply thoughts or jokes that could be interpreted as violating school policy. This is a huge problem. I would be surprised if government agencies don't start using this information to screen new hires. In the short term I would suggest that you DONT use your real name to register for sites like facebook.. since they are nice enough to not let you change it after. From experience I'll let you know that otherwise you'll have to use it knowing that everything you write, your pictures, groups, and friends can and will be monitored by your school.. and possibly others. An example, recently some friends of mine were nearly suspended just for being in a group that mentioned drinking on campus. I can here some of you now whining that that's no big deal, but just think of how much this could cost the students. A year of tuition, hundreds of hours of community service (which is as expensive as overtime given that he is already busy), new living expenses, etc. The potential of private schools to censor and penalize students for communication that is intended to be PRIVATE amoung themselves is rapidly increasing. Now you would expect that since fb has a number of privacy measures (mostly through limiting visibility of profiles), it would be a much more creative and relaxed environment. Well it isn't, and it's boring as heck unless your writing cute little love letters to all your friends. It's gotten much worse lately as many have realized that whatever they write, the wrong people will find out about it. This is a direct failure of the privacy mechanisms that the site setup to, i think, lessen this fear. If you look at the other side of the spectrum, myspace, were your name is whatever you want, everyone writes all about their drunken sex parties, and even slip porn in now and then, you'll see something closer to the creative and fun place that the net could provide. Not to mention that everyone doesn't seem so scared. Too bad the site is focused on 10yo girls.. So, why am I complaining so much and what can be done about it? My idea, which I have roughly implemented, is as follows.  Basically my solution is to create a trust based authentication system. For example in a system similar to these sites, the visibility of Bob's profile could be degraded based on the amount that Bob and/or Bob's friends trusts the viewer, Alice. For the most part everything would be transparent except that Bob would now be able to rate his friends in different categories such as trustworthiness and then optionally tune these ranking thresholds to correspond to levels of visibility. Of course the challenge of this is making it totally distributed and backed by crypto to ensure that the rules are followed regardless of subpoenas.. which my implementation demonstrates. I've drafted up a few papers, and have plenty of implementation code if anyone wants to take a look. So what does everyone else think? Anyone with better ideas? Or maybe your all happy living in a glass house.. I'm sure that anyone that has done extensive non-business communication online has been bitten when the wrong person read things you wrote that weren't intended for her.  Tim ----  Is there any reason that these comment boxes are so tiny? ;)  -- Oh and when is reddit::blogs going live?? 
Interesting article. I was surprised about what I saw when I checked out the product he has been working on: http://www.imsmarter.com/
Well, my dad owns his own business, and owning your own business is a lot less glamorous than most people think, regardless of what industry it is in.
An interesting read. However, what bothers me about such comparisons is that they are never comprehensive.  I mean, if you picked a different set of features you could most probably prove the exact opposite thing -- i.e., that Vista is *nothing* like Tiger. I could use the same technique to prove that Ferrari Testarossa is nothing but a late facsimile of VW Beetle.
The housing bubble is bursting already according to this: http://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=10000103&amp;sid=aDSB370ItSJU&amp;refer=us
Wow, some people really do have a lot of free time... and curiosity!
Hmmm... Google = Big Brother?
Joel [wrote something](http://www.joelonsoftware.com/articles/CamelsandRubberDuckies.html) with more graphs and theory.
Haha, that flying spaghetti monster picture is the best.
I've heard they have weapons of mass destruction.
Are "Real Programmers" an endangered species?
When you have a singular institution (public education) charged with providing something to a broad range of consumers (which, in the US, is growing more and more diverse each day), there have to be some rules about what is covered and what is not.  You just don't have time to cover everything. For me, this isn't a fundamentalist/atheist argument.  It's more a question of how to manage the multitude of diverse opinions on topics that must be taught in schools.  Unless something is an absolute fact, we should include the most commonly held views as those that should be taught, making sure to mention that there are other points of view that are different. As such, I believe there should be at least one other option mentioned when it comes to "how we got here."  Obviously, whether you believe it or not (I don't), the Theory of Evolution deserves to have the lion's share of time devoted to it.  However, there should be mention that there are other points of view.  I'm surprised that, since there are so many people in this country who claim to believe in God, there wouldn't be more than a passing interest in the concept of ID. When we talk about the separation of church and state, we usually think about it meaning that the church is not to be the state.  We definitely bend over backwards to make sure of that-- just look at all the Christmas/Channukah/"holiday" debates we just came out of a week ago.  However, we also should look at the other side of the coin there-- the state is not to be the church.  And when you talk about the origin of the world, you are engaging in both scientific and religious terms. Many people would love to be able to send their children to a religious school.  However, those who want to do so face a major handicap:  they must pay for their child's education while the tax money they have contributed goes to a public school.  I don't want to turn this into a voucher debate (one controversial topic at a time, please!), but this problem does make it more difficult for "regular" people to send their kids to a religious school than to a public one. Anyway, just my $0.02.
Database Engines are mis-used
Duplicate: http://reddit.com/goto?id=20722
shitty headline and blog, you can still smoke in those cities, just not in bars or restaurants. Florida has had this for a couple years. voted down for useless sensationalism.   
I'm also a freelancer, sure, there are stong  side-effects of running your own business. There may  be a time were you are doing great, but you can also  run out of money. The strong pro of working for a  company is safety. The strong pro of running your  own business is that you can switch from selling your "services" to your company, to a "product" based business. This means, basically, you can get rich. There is also the  third kind of workers: people running their own  service-based business that's a bit on the middle...  and that's the status I'm trying to escape currently ;)
More information, including a phone number is available here: http://redtape.msnbc.com/2005/12/new_years_perso.html#posts Excerpt: 3. Credit card offers. They clutter your mailbox, and they are identity theft ticking time bombs. You can opt out of those by calling 1-888-567-8688.  You’ll have to provide your Social Security number.  You can also do so at https://www.optoutprescreen.com/, but the site makes many visitors nervous, because it looks so much like a fraudulent attempt to steal personal information. Ironic.   
This is some guy who's pissed off about being kicked out of AdSense and then read the terms and conditions. How is this good?
No one else has any comments?
Interesting list of high level software development best-practices. I'm going to email this to my boss through an anonymizer.
rock
The article's author comments on being a wage slave with his youthful experience of 26 years, and it shows.  Let's quickly visit some "nuggets" of wisdom: "Common programmers may expect to earn at least $60,000/year, but it is rare for even superstar programmers to command above $150,000, excepting very specialized markets like kernel driver development." The 60k to 150k range for an annual salary is characteristic of a career to which the property "slave" is attached?  Interesting. "But in taking the full risk and reward of the enterprise upon himself, the programmer who is not sorely wanting in skills of business development or marketing must soon find himself enjoying the fruits of his labors, albeit many times only after years of difficult and uncertain unpaid labor." It is astonishing to find that this is held as some sort of dreamlike gold standard.  Mr. Weekly apparently has failed to consider the depth to which "years of difficult and uncertain unpaid labor" might cause many individuals to be satisfied with their 60k-150k salaries.  Some of them might even have responsibilities such as student loan payments, mortgages, or families to take care of. Oh, what the hell.  Quit your job anyway.  Duties be damned, there's a pot of gold at the end of that rainbow! "Wages and debt go hand in hand, for creditors only make loans which can be repaid regularly. Therefore, the single most important question they ask when ascertaining credit is one's present wages." Mr. Weekly is quite unfamiliar with the FICO credit score, which has NO direct reference to one's income. Bankers do care about income, but they care far more about your fidelity to their debts. The theory goes: If you've reliably met your financial obligations in the past, you'll probably meet them again in the future, regardless of income. It's a pretty good theory. -- As far as the actual heart of the article goes, Mr. Weekly seriously devalues and brushes aside the invaluable work performed by the rest of a company to which a programmer gives his allegiance.  I think many project managers, executive officers, salesmen, and marketers would object to the fact that a mere sprinkling of their skills is all that is necessary to turn a decent piece of software into what the author implies is a near unlimited, wage-free source of wealth. But at least he encourages the reader to avoid wanton debt.  That's worth something, I suppose.
Interesting
http://uncyclopedia.org/wiki/Joke
you post some good articles.. and the karma hit you take by posting them is huge! So here is the typical redditer:  * Loves hearing advice about tech startups.   * Not at all interested in knowing enough technology to have his own startup.   * Not interested in anything that takes more than 2 minutes to understand. ah well
pretty stunning even if one knows the numbers by heart ...
So wait, Google the multi-billion dollar company is so cheap that it has to stoop to scamming people out of $100? I think something is overblown here.
* reddit
Putting everyone in single cells would cost a lot of money. Convicted felons can't vote, and they don't usually attract a lot of sympathy from voters. Besides, the prison world is out of sight and out of mind for most people, except when something dramatic and newsworthy happens. So the people in charge, at every level, have a strong incentive to follow the path of least resistance and least expense. Who cares what the prisoners do to each other, so long as there's no big riot or fire or a string of deaths? Even attacks on prison officers are not dealt with seriously in some prison regimes. And even with the best will in the world, forcing large groups of convicted criminals together for long periods, bored and in isolation from the rest of the world, and then trying to stop them from forming a poisonous subculture is ridiculously hard.
this is a nice trick to perform price descrimintation.
Uh oh, sounds like somebody needs his nicotine!
The only gullible suckers here are the viewers who don't realize that it is just some enscenated reality tv show.
How many of these are real?
What??  This story is HOW old (with no discernable update)?  Not sure if I'm missing some reason why this is suddenly relevant. Or is someone just posting a slew of Google links/stories?
I've been married four years and so far it's great.  Not easy, mind you, but great.
I can understand the need to create legislation prohibiting the destruction of ballots... but "eating" ?
it was also brilliant TV.  How are viewers who enjoyed watching it 'gullible suckers ' ?
Trust me guys, they're delicious. If we were allowed to eat our votes nobody would get elected.
Same guy behind the zombie video game: http://www.doubleviking.com/?p=7780   
If I took that picture and sent it to you would you be able to tell if they are happy or sad?
I could be glad to provide some fresh information from Italy if only the units used in the article were more euro-readable ;) Btw, an italian cappuccino is something like 25cc of milk  plus a short espresso. Ingredients are only part of the story, the reason most cappuccino out of Italy are impossible  to taste is that the coffee is not well made and the capuccino  seems like milk+coffee just mixed.
interesting story for the small developer to read. These guys don't have any issues with what was done, but its certainly an interesting read
Interview with the Netflix of Porn creator.
Use your Google: * Short - 8 US fluid ounces = 237 cc  * Tall - ((8 * 3) / 2) * US fluid ounces = 355 cc  * Venti - 20 US fluid ounces = 591 cc Championship - 5 to 6 US fluid ounces = 148 to 177 cc 25 cc = 0.85 US fluid ounces; If by "short" you mean a shot, meaning about 1.5 ounces or 44cc, then I guess that makes sense. Sounds a little light.
Who said this was news? This isn't news even if it **is** real. So when you say "it may have some value," I agree.
I can't believe this is sitting at 1 hours after it was posted. Just goes to show that the dumping bin of every type of story doesn't work.
I am the author. I'm now a downright grizzly old man of 27. I'm pretty amused by how quickly some people latched onto my age and decided to brush aside anything I had to say as a result, because I clearly (in their eyes) couldn't have possibly lived long enough to be able to bring insight into the labor market without a few decades of work experience. I realize that plenty of people are risk averse and recognize the comforts that a $60k+ / year job provide. Those people can live a reasonable lifestyle, enjoy their jobs, and find life content. The economy is largely composed of such people and absolutely requires these people. But there are some people who have it in them to go it on their own, and they owe it to themselves (and society) to make a try at it. These people are a little less risk-averse, are interested in developing a broader skillset, etc. Some of this is luck (to not be covered in crushing debt) and some of this is chutzpah (or hubris, as you please). As for my brushing aside of the value of the other players in the company - I think it's a reaction to the fact that executive management and salespeople already effectively operate on commission. If the company does well, they do well. But the same is not generally true of the engineering staff. And only engineers capable of acting in a founder-style role and having ownership over their ideas will be able to see the sorts of returns that executives and salespeople are regularly able to achieve. And if enough engineers leave to start their own ventures, management at larger companies may consider giving engineers a larger ownership of the company as retention strategy. Until there is market pressure to do so, however, we're unlikely to see significant ownership on the part of the engineers and innovators who are creating a company's core property.
My answers were the same even with his rewritten questions. I hope people aren't really so flaky that a simple rewording would change their opinions on major issues.
Duplicate: http://reddit.com/info?id=9129
This could lead to inflation as they dump dollars which means interest rates go up which kills the housing bubble.  I don't much mind because I rent but an 18 year old kid can get a no money down loan on a half million dollar studio condo. Just don't blame the coming crash on capitalism, it's the fault of fiat currence, the FED, and GSEs like Fannie Mae.
Also: I find it telling that you used the word "religious", when this has nothing to do with religion. That is a symptom of unclear, fuzzy thinking: the same kind of thinking which led you to relate economics to religion in one of your essays.

Google and Yahoo announced paid download VOD services at CES this week. Google detailed an agreement with the NBA and CBS, Yahoo plans a Yahoo Go! software package.
It's likely that more people would vote libertarian if Instant Runoff Voting(IRV) were more widely in use.
Ok, time to ask the Lisp gurus hanging out here. What makes a Lisp Machine different from a Computer?
This is an excellent essay on Web 2.0 - the concept, the trends, benefits to the business. It is a long read - but highly recommend it!
It's easy to make 3 line AdWords style ads, but making a TV ad with high production value is quite a bit more expensive. It's not obvious that the granularity that Cringely is talking about will ever be reached. Still, a very neat idea.
Do they really think this is a good time to take on Google? Can't wait.
_how low can you go_ /me dances
I've read your essay before. Take heart that Paul Graham, noted Lisp guru, investor/VC, ViaWeb founder etc. etc. and a pretty good essayist, says essentially the same thing: http://www.paulgraham.com/wealth.html
This covers what a LISP machine is pretty well: http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Lisp_Machine
Thanks. These cards are helpful. But some are a bit old.
An angry newsvine beta tester lambastes Davidson's new project, expect newswhine.com in the near future.
Who cares? It's Apple's loss for not selling their OS to 95% of the computer market.
Funny. Only readable with lynx. 
is this going to be another one of those 'posted monthly until the end of time' links?
Libertarian in one and centrist pragmatist in the other. I don't think either quiz is biased.
1. I was summarizing the article ("I'm not the first observer to compare the Nolan quiz with religious evangelism. The comparison is hard to avoid!") 2. Do you understand the concept of an analogy? When someone says "these poll numbers are as shaky as cafeteria jello", they do not mean that polling is related to jello. They are trying to use ideas from one to describe another.   So, in this particular instance, religions (and cults) often put out questionaires with leading questions that try to get you to conclude you're a special sort of person and they can help you if you join. And for the case of economics, I was saying that they were both irrational systems of belief in some form of "higher power".
Its vandalism. RTFM is a real world term used on the net, and wikipedia is not the place for satire.
Do you know anything about polling? People's responses on these questions are _highly_ contigent on how things are worded.
having said that, if someone tells my mum to "RTFM" I don't really want her to know what it means ;) But thats not really what wikipedia is about.
I scored 41% and did not cheat at all. You?
Well, I was going to say "Dammit, this blogger beat my Wikinews scoop about this to press by less than 48 hours", but that would just be sour grapes.
Yawn.
Check again.  The link goes to Uncyclopedia, not Wikipedia.  Uncyclopedia is the place for satire (and sarcasm, misinformation, and other things)
It's very UK-centric: "number of counties in England, prior to the 1974 boundary changes" Huh? 29%
Some really neat information and advice on fitness from a physical therapist who specializes in neuro-muscular relationships.  He says, "The brain is our guardian; like a protective mother with lots of kids..."  And he goes on to explain some neuro-muscular relationships and how to use them to our advantage and contrary to normal exercise routines!  Great stuff!
Yep, IM Smarter didn't take off. It might have been a bad idea, or poorly marketed, or just bad timing. Take your pick. But I learned a lot developing it and a few thousand people enjoyed using it. Now I have hundreds of thousands of people using my wiki software instead. The moral of the story is to try lots of things and run like hell with what works.
I like the bit about getting offered a job at Apple just because their software was good. I think I ought to go into the Mac software market.
Self-referential posts are the best kind.
Reddit readers are just too smart.
yep. Just realised. Damn floating window leaving the URL off again... I could be such a sucker for phishing attacks. (sound of bank account being emptied).
huh? So you don't snigger when they call them "corrective" centers?
Sherwin's ultra 7000 known for ease of use and great color matches has added a new stabilizer.
That was the most rediculous discussion I've ever seen. A clear example of how the 'me first' attitude is bringing down our society.
I dont get it.
In this part, philosophicus shows how email is sent across the Internet (in “packets,” using “packet switching”), looks at whether email users have any legal grounds for an expectation of privacy (no), and describes the devices that would be needed the government to inspect your email and decide to investigate you. We conclude by characterizing such devices as weapons of war, and their use against the civilian population of the United States as treason (q.v. The United States Constitution, Article 3, Section 3, “levying war”).
I've been following the CoS for many, many years.  This is a really good summary of the battles some people have had with them.
I thought Norvig pulled a Reddit and went Python.
No, no!  Get this off Reddit!  I want first dibs.
A review of all the options to know what is popular on the web and blogosphere. Digg, Shoutwire, common times,...and Reddit
Maybe you should read http://www.meyerweb.com/eric/comment/chech.html (which is a quine)
So Microsoft copies Apple. Nothing new, thanks for talking, bye.
Sounds righteous to me.  I think MySpace will end up doing something similar.
The link was BS. This comment, however, is a gem.
It doesn't need to have high production values.  AdWords has considerably lower production values than a banner ad, or fancy flash ad. Since the ads are targetted, grabbing your attention is less important, while the content is more important.
uhh... http://www.freshmeat.net anyone?
Yeah this is what the rest of the world, who hate starbucks, actually call a coffee. Starbucks is to coffee what McDonalds is to burgers and sandwiches.
"I hope people aren't really so flaky" &lt;-- That's sarcasm. Of course they are.
Derren Brown r00lz
1. It *is* evangelism - of course it is. Putting in the word "religious" sounds stupid - evangelism is all you've got to say. Yes, that's my entire argument. It *sounds stupid* to many people's brains, because it's superfluous - so don't do it. 2. I understand your analogy; it's really obvious, isn't it? But I disagree with it. In fact, economists find it pretty annoying when their field is misconstrued as blind faith in the Invisible Hand. Read this: http://cafehayek.typepad.com/hayek/2005/12/market_utopians.html  Economics is not based on belief in a power we cannot understand. It is based on complex systems, something we know we *can* understand. To the naive observer, complex systems seem to be magic: the human brain is so complex it leads many people to believe an intelligence must have designed it. But the human brain isn't magic, and neither is the economy. Economists know this stuff - it's their job, after all! Read the book "Reinventing the Bazaar" for a good look at some areas in which economists admit the market fails, and a statist solution must be implemented.
It will never work in Europe. Consumer and retail psychology is different and so is the way advertising on broadcast media is done. Neat idea though.
Has the growth of the Blogosphere crossed the Tipping-Point? Is there enough “valuable” activity out there to warrant a closer look by the company board? This post highlights some recent developments that may answer these questions for you. I am constantly updating the "Recent Updates" section of this post with relevant and latest market analysis numbers and news.
yes, you are right. it forces the user to trust this third party. but, in the other hand, being centralized allows the third party to give value added services on top of it.
link not working
Why don't these groups grow up, they shouldn't take everything so seriously!
This is neat. I'm in English room 3.
Yes, a great example of U.S. soldiers risking their lives to do what is right and moral (i.e., stopping a massacre.) But what does it have to do with _Iraq_?  It is not mentioned. 
Some of those movies may not be in the public domain. For example, archive.org seems to have pulled their copy of Plan 9 from Outer Space due to "issues". http://www.archive.org/details/Plan9FromOuterSpace *later* hm.. the page is back, but the links are dead
The actual link is: http://www.lynxmas.com/mainpage.aspx
BIG thing missing from the chooser: don't ask how long you want the system to be able to get security patches.  This varies widely among distros. 
video won't play in mplayer
Why would open source freeware types like Google package RealPlayer and Norton AntiVirus in Google Pack, when RealAlternative, Avast and AVG are out there? Evil.
I actually got a lot of points on that one, even though I'm from the U.S.  I just thought about the size of England, thought about the size of counties and made an estimate. I think I was within 3 of the actual answer.
Good reminders: "A site that exists primarily to tease people off the Internet into buying something almost always cries out to be ignored. Money is nice. Bandwidth is nice. Graphic design is occasionally nice. But if you treat your Web site as a pimple on the butt of something much larger then it will probably be ripe for suck.com." From personal experience, I could not agree more. 
How about a broken link? But then you wouldn't have the satisfaction of knowing about it.
Insiders, including co-founders Sergey Brin and Lawrence Page and chief executive officer Eric Schmidt, sold $1.8 billion (directly and indirectly) of Google shares in 2005. That was more than the $1.4 billion in sales in the entire Internet software industry in 2004, according to Thomson Financial
Wow!  These guys have taken a very simple and practical idea and made of it something of real public value.  Neat stuff.
With reference to 5), consider the symmetrical case: Should MI6 be able to legally assassinate people in countries with which the U.K. is not at war?  Bear in mind that this includes you.
This article didn't even mention Fannie Mae.  Banks don't fear a housing bubble pop because banks are now just a bunch of brokers -- they have no skin in the game.
Cramer is like a Payday bar - nuts on the outside, good stuff in the middle
This article is all about web design from over two years ago; most of the websites seem to be much different than what the text describes.
I rang Starbucks once and asked them why they did this - they said there "wasn't room" on the menu to fit the short sizes in. Ha! Anyway, this is rather old news - other papers have covered the Starbucks short issue. Personally I think his explanation is weak. But what this guy leaves out is a crucial fact: how to get served this short size coffee. Starbucks staff are told: if someone asks for a "small" - serve a tall (that's a 12oz cup); if someone asks for "medium" serve a tall. Whatever they ask for, serve a tall. The only way you can get a short (8oz) size is to specifically ask for a "short" - whether cappuchino, mocha, latte, whatever. Sometimes the staff will deny there is any such size, but that's because they are stupid. Usually there is no hassle. Sometimes they will claim that they don't have the right size cups - in which case point them over to the children's milk size cups (which is the only place an 8oz appears on a standard Starbucks menu) and say: "That one". I don't do it to be a pain in the butt - I just don't want to drink so much liquid. And it's mildly (very mildly) subversive.   
1. What non-religious group of evangelists "put out questionaires with leading questions that try to get you to conclude you're a special sort of person and they can help you if you join"? (Furthermore, you missed my point -- I wasn't asserting that the quiz was religious myself, I was quoting someone else.) 2. This is probably not the best forum for discussing my article. However, nothing in [the piece](http://www.aaronsw.com/weblog/understandingeconomics) claims that economies are unknowable. And any religious person would sometimes "admit [God] fails, and a [human] solution must be implemented". My claim is simply that mandatory economic education should be resisted for the same reason mandatory religious education should -- because it's factually baseless and politically harmful.
I remember him from 1999 - he's just nuts. 
This is poorly reasoned. Not that they don't make a few good points, but there are better targets than PETA.
This is Albert Hofmann ( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Albert_Hofmann ), not Abbie Hoffman, who died in 1989 ( http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abbie_Hoffman ). 
But it sure is entertaining. :)
Maybe we don't JUST want to read about Lisp all the time.
Hey Shrub, what part of 'no' don't you understand?  
I couldnt stop laughing!
You might want to keep in mind that the episode has been cut in half through third-party editing from 30 minutes to 15 minutes ("Bullshit!" airs without commercial interruptions). There's fifteen more minutes of arguments that may or may not be stronger than the ones hosted on Google Video.
lmao
Sorry, this link puts you on page 3 of the article.
isn't reddit supposed to be for NEWS?
Analysis of ourselves through the PC Magazine 50 greatest gadgets list
If they had a size twice that of a "Grande" [or whatever the largest size is; I can't be bothered to check right now], I'd take it.  Of course, I only buy Starbucks coffee in Barnes and Noble (a bookstore), and if they served two liter mochas (that would stay hot), I'd buy that for 3 times the price. Anyway, I'd say the price-insensitive folk are the ones that pay half as much for less than half as much drink.  And Starbucks is still better than anything I've managed to make at home. :) 
Duplicate: http://reddit.com/info?id=24385
Evidently, the freedom to assemble and protest peacefully without interference from the government goes a long way to providing an alternative to terrorism.
Hilarious!  Very well done.
Interesting to see Microsoft mentioned there a couple times. Kudos for not jumping on the hate bandwagon. I really like that pen too. Anyone interested in good design should check out "The Human Factor" by Kim Vicente. It's an excellent read!
I'm not sure why this site has pictures inbetween the paragraphs, but they  provide a really nice break from reading all that text. Nice design.
excellent
I thought the animal testing part was pretty well reasoned. A world where PETA ruled would be a world in which my diabetic cousin would be dead right now.
Nasa is goignt pay russia for rides to space. What is wrong with the usa, Where is Kenndy when you need him.
duncan hunter is busted.  probably rohrbacher too.
how can this sort of thing go on?
The animal testing portion was probably the strongest bit here. Worth watching.
I study ee at what's considered Argentina's "MIT", and even though I'm just a junior, I can really relate to this article. Seems good engineering schools are similar everywhere. Damn good article! I will realy consider getting a chick on my next semester's electronics courses :D
or you guys dont know what that means. too bad, look it up.
Ha oh, for a second I'd forgotten that Erlang is Lisp..
Agreed, they make some easy punches, but overall this is sensationalist drivel. Animal rights, or rights of any kind are far more complicated than this show (or PETA) would have you believe.
Wonderful to see someone counter the extermist terriorist inside our own boarders.  :)  Not exactly but I like the point that PETA "supported" those actions in montary ways.  Scary to see what people will do to save a portion of food or the next cure to AIDS.  I wonder what PETA's plan is to cure world-wide hunger? Vegi-burgers?  I would say for every one animal they save i'm going to eat three.
You don't feel like taking a risk on a young guy, you don't get the rewards. so simple.
Ah, I got all nostalgic for suck.com.  Polly Esther, wherefore art thou? I met Carl once.  I'm not sure if he's really a wacko, or it just amused him to make me think he was a wacko.  (Perhaps those are the same thing?) 
This is great! 
lots of good info!
&gt; A senior administration official later confirmed that the president believes the Constitution gives him the power to authorize interrogation techniques that go beyond the law to protect national security. This belief is incorrect. The president cannot go beyond the law, ever. Is there any legal or legislative action in process regarding December's NSA spying revelation? The reach of executive power must be clarified, not so that people can heap scorn upon Bush, but so that everyone involved in securing the U.S. can know what is right and what is wrong.
Best quote:  "We will live in a society where the best educated engineers are not designing anti-lock brakes. They are either managing comparatively poorly educated people who are designing anti-lock brakes, stitching up wounds in people who were injured by faulty anti-lock brakes, or defending companies that got sued for their anti-lock brake systems that didn't work."
repost?
I have it on good authority that the author considers this one of the silliest rants he's ever written, and he has no idea how people have managed to take it so seriously. I believe he also plans to discontinue the use of satire as a means of making a softer point.
Collections of Downloadable - Tweaks and Tips, Fixes for Windows XP, General Tweaks, Security Tweaks and Utilities for XP
couldnt find anything special in this article.
another good one, from Greenspun: &gt; *"I calculated that the students were paying about $80 in tuition/lecture-hour. I withdrew a stack of $100 bills from my BankBoston account and I handed one out to each undergraduate in the course. I then proceeded to give my talk, telling the students that I was happy to teach them but I was not going to take their money."*
I forget where I read about this idea, but apparently sometime in the past, students used to pay their professors individually, which might be a solution to some of the problems Phil is talking about.  That would certainly cut down on the bureaucracy, since it would be very evident exactly how much money was going toward administrative overhead. Also, the education market is a currently distorted by government loans and subsidies.  Universities charge more because students' abilities to pay are artificially increased by the government. 
Terrible IF true but right now the quote is a totally unsubstantiated assertion made by a publication with a known bias.  As it currently stands, it is mere rabble rousing and not real reporting.
Never thought that Argentina would have a MIT. How is the egometer there?
You wont see these on US television ;-)
Interestingly, the phrase "organized religion bashing and neutralization of moral outcry" reminded me more of the actions of liberals over the past 50 years than the GOP over the past six years (not that you had accused anyone of any such thing -- the exerpt from the book had already put that thought in my mind). What I see is the left and the right in America are pulling us steadily away from libertarianism. Through both the social programs and political correctness of the left, and the crack down on personal freedoms of the right ("War on Drugs"), the distinction mentioned in the 2nd paragraph of the article, between the ruling and the ruled, has been put in place. Nearly half the country thinks we are reliant on the government economically and most of the other half thinks we are reliant on it for moral guidance.  In both cases, few seem to be aware the important issue is reliance on a big brother that has been accepted by nearly all. The opposite of totalitarianism (communism / socialism on the left or naziism / fascism on the right) is libertarianism / objectivism.  Until we learn, as a country of individuals, to be self-reliant, we will continue to move in a dangerous direction.
I guess I'm not as horrified by this as I'm supposed to be. Such a book is not something I'd keep around the house, but I carry an organ donation card, and if there weren't better medical uses for my skin I wouldn't have any objection to it being used in such a manner, if that's what someone else wanted.
So all the 331 best places to live happen to be in the US, huh? Who would have thought that, say, Waco, Texas beats places like Brisbane, Vancouver, Geneva, Zurich, Vienna...?
lua is generally considered easier to embed, faster, and also has very friendly syntax, and some powerful features. Less batteries included though.
Nah, this is bunk.  Amazing how internet can spread this so fast though.
wtf? of course GNOME and KDE require modern systems... if you have cheap hardware, you should use the old software as well.
This is a great article.. Along with the infamous New Yorker article: http://www.newyorker.com/critics/content/articles/051010crat_atlarge which was featured on reddit.com as well when it first debuted. These are SERIOUS things to think about. Serious in terms of understanding America, free thinking, academia and what we value as a society. Every entrepreneur should take example of this....  Has anyone read the Google Story yet?  A fascinating read even though most of it is already available on the Internet in random blogs...   What is most interesting is the amount of help Stanford gave the project... both officially, and unofficially though personal contacts... smarts and passion sometimes are not enough compared to personality...  We all get 4.0s... or maybe the best of us get 3.2s... :)   
"More than any other school in the United States, MIT is in a strong position to become tuition-free. If Harvard Business School were to ask corporations or government to give them money so that students didn't have to pay, it might be fairly pointed out that most MBAs were in school out of naked self-interest. Why should Joe Sixpack pay for a 25 year-old $100,000/year McKinsey drone's attempt to become a $250,000/year McKinsey consultant?"    An even better argument...
this WSJ editor needs some new topics to write about apparently. "So the other day I was 'writing up' my weekly column, and I discovered that Word can make charts like Excel..."
uh...this story isn't very interesting...
welkome to amerika
There are always people who think they will never be the ones who get caught.  Perhaps they are just more impulsive, and don't stop to think of long term consequences?
But it has a much better title!  Gave me a chuckle.
It doesn't thats the point.  Those pro-choice hippies are more worried about saving a slab of chicken breast then any worth while cause.   :)  Sorry buddy, I'm really just having a good time don't take offense to my lack of spelling skills and opinions.  I know nothing about PETA but they seem like their cause is lost in contrast to the amount of other real problems that plague our world.  Thanks for the spell check Zimba...
Hmm. All commenters so far have ignored what seems to me to be the author's *real* point in writing this article, which comes near the end: namely, that the "heterosexual/homosexual" identity dichotomy has been constructed only in the past century by Christians and/or middle-class intellectuals, and does not make sense. I think people in general spend way too much time categorizing people. I knew a guy in college who married a gal; they are still married, but in the meantime he had a sex change, and is now a she. Does that make them both "lesbians"? Similarly, what about people with XY chromosomes who exhibit female body types? And what about other intersex people? Never mind "hetero"/"homo"--it's become clear to me that even "male"/"female" is, in the end, a false dichotomy.   
Good design or not, you can't put a polish on a turd. And that's about all the good design did for the advice in this article.
install the standalone version of google screensaver without google pack - even hide the google logo
Shameless plug for my posting on why principles matter in software development.
FWIW, the Center for Consumer Freedom is a corporate front akin to the BSA in the software world. CCF's current thing is to try and convince people that there dangers of obesity are junk science (so don't worry about eating more hamburgers!!!)
And this is why you should study in Europe where the fees are lower and the education better.
I dont know if you have such a service in the US, but in Europe you can actually track the location of people through a website for a fee from their cell, which is kind of Orwelian.
A very informative overview of AJAX.  This guy rocks.
Yes, it's aged really well, in that - 1. You want lots of users! (What Phil calls a "community") 2. In most cases, you want your website to be a front end to a database. Let's take a look at what hasn't really worked out well - 1. You want to use AOLServer instead of Apache. (Ummm, ok) 2. You should use Oracle. (Well, it seems Postgres has been a viable option for a while now) 3. You need to use the Ars Digita Community System. (Now we've entered La La Land...)
Most distributions allow you to update from one release to another. Sometimes for a little fee.
Or on Google Video when you don't live in a supported country.
By the way: reddit uses XHTML. Doesn't validate, though ... :-) 
i looked through this guy's papers. he is simply amazing. real expert.
I've seen them. They're not any better.
One of the major problems with Penn and Teller's show is that they're more interested in making fun of the other side than actually understanding it. PETA doesn't even get a chance to explain their position before it's held up for ridicule. Even so, it's clear they have a rather serious one -- where's the moral difference between hurting people and hurting animals? Penn and Teller argue it's OK to hurt animals if it helps us. For example, they say we need to test on animals so we can get better medicine. In reality, [PETA is not in favor](http://www.peta.org/factsheet/files/FactsheetDisplay.asp?ID=87) of banning medical testing -- they merely suggest that try to use new non-animal technology (like computer simulations and human culture testing) whenever possible and try to "reduce the number of animals used and to minimize pain and distress" when it's not. Of course, that's a position that requires thinking a little bit to discuss. It's much more fun to call people Nazis.
But according to the regulations you need to get the permission of the owner.  Maybe this is easily forged though?
The world has heard quite enough from Greenspun already. -1
This is a very cool tool to manage your bookmarklet
IMO procrastination itself can be a form of turning slightly away from the wind.  Most of my maths proofs have been done in a multithreaded way, eg 10 lines of slashdot to one line of proof.  However, the background processes must be of the correct type, things that can be done in 30 second blocks and don't require much paging of memory.  Walking into the kitchen and pouring a cup of tea is one of my favourites.
I must have been such a procrastinator today to go through all what was written about it (procrastination). It could have been nicer if the 'author' rattled a bit less in his vivd thoughts, really. I even have missed an important errand to do! what was it? oh yeah, having my daily ice cream!
that's what's lack of self-esteem. Those chills you had are a few inches away from a Prozac pill!   stay off course and live it up.
I get enraged whenever I hear about the telcos trying to price different content. And this article makes good points, but it always feels like they are forgetting that the internet is not a 1-way medium. Many of the benifits are people putting out their own data, and this will become increasingly true with (legit) p2p. So now they will make it so that only the "rich" can take part in multimedia delivery? We'd be pretty much back to TV, and that pisses me off.
A NYT article a few weeks ago on the size of college and university endowments made it plain that for many of the top universities with endowments measured in the tens of billions of dollars, undergraduate tuition could be paid in full without touching the principal. Also, in case anybody missed it, the post is from 1998. (It was the "we don't have relational database servers available for student use" line that first tipped me off...) 
Date Revealed
Preatty cool..
That's just cruel. Why does anyone use XHTML on websites? It's not like their individual contribution is going to make the Web evolve beyond primordial tag soup. I would understand if there were useful applications for it, but most people seem to use it because it has an X at the beginning so it must be eXtreme.
Totally hilarious--father takes over his son's nerf toy.
Have you ever thought the methan releases what meat industry is cousing to the atmosphere? Or how much they cut rainforests to have some room to cows for example? Many good things can be done poorly or nicely whith results. There is plenty of animal rights and ethical treatment groups which don't use sensation driven advertising and give us informative news.. I encourage everybody to support them. Here, in finland for example is Animalia group. And I have an argument about animal testing. Animal testing doesn't give scientist relevant results compared to clinical testing for example. Only thing why they use animal testing is becouse it's cheap. But I think that they should develop alternative methods becouse it is really unethical animal treatment. Yeah.. that holocaust thing was really vulgar and doesn't give good thoughts about animal rights.
I agree with Mattmozzo, animal welfare is way on the bottom of the list.  Human welfare is more important.  Other causes that seek to improve human life is far more important.
This is one of your best essays yet in my opinion, pulling together so many things you've touched on in past ones. You have an incredible gift for clear thinking, synthesis and communication. I wish I could have read you when I was in my teens, because that's when so many of us were so ill-guided by the befuddled others in this world! As the other guy said, "long live and prosper!" And keep writing.
I think this was a good article, but it might be nice if somebody had put a [NSFW] ("not safe for work") in the title.
"it [Haskell] is a better language" i almost stopped reading there. obvious bias? yes. i kept reading. not much of a point except 'haskell community needs work' what community?
needs work, okay idea
Yeah, I was thinking much the same way as you. This article just sounds like they took one of dozens articles about Lisp and replaced Lisp with Haskell.
I was actually referring to stuff like this section from http://philip.greenspun.com/panda/server-programming "You would think that picking a Web site development language would be trivial. Obviously the best languages are safe and incorporate powerful object systems. So let's do everything in Common Lisp or Java. ... Computer scientists can't believe that a scripting language could be as good as Lisp and better than Java for developing Internet applications. But it turns out to be almost true. A scripting language is better than Java because a scripting langauge doesn't have to be compiled. A scripting language can be better than Lisp because string manipulation is simpler. " While specific choices of technology rarely age well unless the choice is lisp or maybe Fortran, his explanation of the problem domain is excellent, and explains some of the reasons behind RoR clobbering java (and lisp) in web programming.
this is another ROM emulation recorded on a pc - this guy played the game at a fraction of the real-time speed.  it was beaten in '16 minutes', but it probably took a month to record.
These Speech bubble comments adding a little more interest to comments. It's made up with HTML, CSS and Photoshop. The document is validated XHTML 1.0 Transitional and for conformance to W3C Recommendations and other standards.
I think the author was presumptuous. How do you know that it's lack of community? Maybe there is another reason. For instance, communities tend to have leadership. The Perl community has real luminaries, but the luminaries have humility and tend to defer to Larry Wall, no? In Python land there are some big brains around, but people let Guido Van Rossom make the final decisions. Ruby? Matz. I'm familiar with the Lisp community enough to know that there are no clear leaders. And the same marginalized language complaint can be made of Lisp. It's presumptuous to elevate the corellation to cause without some reasoning to back it up. 
As George Bernard Shaw said "the single biggest problem in communication is the illusion that it has taken place."
This is just... Old. The Haskell community already knows this and has discussed it for several years. To counter just  of his points:  haskell.org SHOULDN'T promote a specific "distribution". Haskell is a standardized language that is implemented by several compilers/interpreters. Ruby, Python and Perl (his examples) are languages with a canonical implementation that more or less IS the language. Haskell 98 has several implementations with different uses and goals. All (or the most relevant to a newcomer any way) are presented on the homepage, along with what they are good at. A potential user has to make a choice, and if he looks at a tutorial they will likely recommend one.
This is recycled news from about 5 years ago (or more).  But, it's a huge problem.  It's not just with electronic parts, but also US companies going into third world countries and setting up plants that pollute like that wouldn't be able to here.  The fact is, most third world countries would rather have a polluting US company than no US company at all.  The US should hold their companies to the standards that exist here, not elsewhere.
... and where, despite it all, fewer people attend university than in the US (not well-known, but it's true).
I'm going to do a bold statement: Haskell is way too low level! More precisely, my claims are that:  - a language is low level when it makes certain things more difficult to express than necessary;  - the casual [contrieved] recipes to circumvent this inexpressivness are called design patterns;  - therefore, omnipresence of design patterns in a language structure is a sign that this language is low level;  - as soon as you want to do I/Os, or anything vaguely stateful, in Haskell, you need beginner-unfriendly monads, which definitely are a design pattern, and a difficult to understand one;  --&gt; Haskell is too low level in contexts where you want to do something stateful. And a typical example of something stateful is: the real world. Don't misread me, I love Haskell when used at its intended purpose: modelize highly logical/algorithmical stuff in a perfectly clean way. Only, that's a very narrow niche, most of what we actually do is unnecessarily complex to express that way. The same way you could do system programming in Prolog, but shouldn't.
The Simons seem to lead the Haskell community - Peyton-Jones and Marlow.
Wow... thanks for the heads up... I didn't even realize!
You just don't realize what a 23-pound hardcover anthology feels like until you hold one. I highly recommend a trip to Barnes and Noble or Amazon.
Is that fewer people overall, or a lower percentage of people? The comparison is worthless if you're simply comparing total numbers of people attending university.
This has nothing to do with the sexual orientation of those being spyed on. It's just the LGBT group trying to focus a universal issue on their own cause. Have some decency and fight for the rights of *everyone*.
That or the companies paying the telcos will find themselfs out of bizness due to too high prices.
Just because something strange is reported on the Internet does not mean that it is false. This report comes from the Associated Press, via the Boston Globe. Those are reputable sources. You're not.
This is stupid, Oooh I see a face in the Image compression artifacts!!
An excellent book. Highly recommendable.
why, oh why must all those old posts be posted again and again....... joel this, joel that, graham this , graham that.. its 2006 not 2001, we have already read it 20 times already. If you like graham or joel just go read what's on their site.. don't keep posting every single thing they have ever written... unless it's new that is :P
They're really expecting everyone to upgrade to Vista? Already, Microsoft is conflicting with reality in minor ways (especially in the music and gaming worlds), but when their biggest-selling product stops getting security updates it'll be a shitstorm.
ohh yeah.. if this continue we might as well get it over with and just post them all at once. 
&gt;the fact that Perl, Python and Ruby have become popular while Haskell has stayed a marginal language is a failure of the Haskell community It sounds like the author is faulting the Haskell community for "not trying hard enough" or something.  But it seems to me that the reason Haskell is unpopular is that it just isn't the kind of language that's fated to be popular right now.  (disclosure: I'm a Lisp guy, so I'm only partly qualified for this) But I think that at least part of the reason for Haskell and Lisp's unpopularity is that they don't go out of their way to provide stuff that the so-called "average programmer" takes for granted -- like easy I/O and infix notation.  Haskell's and Lisp's respective communities have their reasons, which are perfectly legitimate, but they (at least, a lot of Lispers and the author of this post) haven't come to terms with the fact that if 'unconventional' or 'revolutionary' or 'unique'  are part of what your language *is*, it's not likely to be embraced by the mainstream quickly.  Changing people's minds takes time, and "trying harder" to make that happen is like trying harder to strike a match on a wet cake of soap.   Of course, none of this is meant to suggest that standardizing on a single distribution and whatnot aren't a good idea -- that would make Lisp a lot nicer too.
Sorry, not basic enough. How about explanations each step of the way of what U or f or n are?
For whatever it's worth, all six of these points seem false to me.  This essay reads more like the kind of cheery presentation a consultant might give to a big company than someone trying to get at the truth.
Haskell has a vibrant and active community. Why would you ask "what community?"
Thanks, soegaard.  I really need to update the website and software (it's been a while for each), so it was a pleasant surprise to see this hit reddit today.
Oh funny! I needed that. Wich I could give it more than one point.
The fees are only lower because citizens pay for them from their higher taxes (not that I am against that). But foreign students have to pay full fees don't they?
What I mean with argentina's MIT is that's considered the best   engineering school, so some refer to it that way.  The egometer depends on each person. For example, most people I met at MIT were more humble than anything else, as opposed to popular belief. Same goes here.
Pretty cool. And it comes with rambling political commentary at no extra cost.
Are you reading the 6 points as 6 myths?
ACtually *you* tell it where to find software and it remembers for the next person. Could not find popular stuff like Total Commander, or Nessus
Article looks at the dreadful history of the Philadelphia 76ers recent West Coast road trips.
Another data point to show that AIDS is really a gay disease...
his pictures, let him add whatever text he wants. you don't like it? don't read it. it isn't that hard.
This was so good it almost made me faint
Ever hear the one about a student who accidentally solved a problem thought to be unsolvable?
I tried to get that low once. But I only got to -8. Clearly I have much to learn...
You're right, and my ignorance of the relative populations of the US and Europe was showing. Still, such demographic knowledge should not be necessary to extract a valid comparison from a statement.
Even though I hadn't read that one, I still agree with simonsays. I'll add to it... When I go read a blog post (which typically has links to other articles), and I come back 5 minutes later to see one of the other articles posted, you can count on me voting it down.
But don't forget: we're bringing them freedom.
You must find your Yoda.  I recommend http://reddit.com/user/haixiu/   With their 75 posts from http://azgoogle.blogspot.com/ in 2 days, certainly they have much to teach you.
"When I go read a blog post (which typically has links to other articles), and I come back 5 minutes later to see one of the other articles posted, you can count on me voting it down." Why? That seems a little immature to me. Maybe you should just vote based on whether you like an article or not, instead of using the voting system to punish people for not finding the article the "right" way. 
Articles comments about the departure to the Minnesota Vikings of former Philadelphia Eagles Offensive Coordinator Brad Childress, and the naming of Marty Mornhinweg as his replacement.
What do you mean by AIDS being a gay disease? Millions of heterosexual people have AIDS. Do you mean that a larger percentage of homosexuals have AIDS as opposed to heterosexuals? Or that HIV-infected homosexuals are more likely to develop full-blown AIDS? I don't understand the statement.
They're not adding new content, they're just shooting for higher karma, and they're being lazy about it.  I don't want to see a link I just saw 5 minutes ago, but that's just me. I'll admit, I've been tempted to do it myself (post loosely related articles), but it never felt right. Maybe I'm being a bit too extreme, and possibly immature (I'm just a 42 yr old kid -- at heart anyway).  I'm still not persuaded that I'm wrong.
&gt; "why must all those old posts be posted again" Sorry, but this is how reddit works. Enough people  read this for this first time now, so they voted it  and it was promoted to the home page. When stuff  are not useful enough they will just live few hours  in the NEW section.
How to cruise for free wireless and then use it for eeeviiilll!
Interesting that the guy who posted the worst one (google.ca posted by askew, garnering -35 points) still has positive karma (1).  If you post negative stuff, shouldn't you have lower karma than a newbie?
You know I'm pretty sure any intelligent person could've told you that these were myths. The problem is that your garden variety pointy-haired boss **believes** in these myths...
I live in Portland, Oregon, damn near the hoity toity coffee epicenter of the US. You can't trip without stumbling into a coffee joint. I still drink Starbucks because everybody else can't make anything that tastes better. I'd stick with Coffee People iced coffees, which are cheap and damn tasty when they're done right, but the consistency just isn't there.
Exactly.  Rising real estate values are a wash for people who own their own home.  They are a boon for people who own multiples houses or other real estate.  And they are a really bad for people who don't own a home yet, i.e. young people. 
If the US held American factories in 3rd-world countries to the same pollution standards that exist here, it would become less economical to have factories in 3rd-world countries, putting that poor African kid you always see on TV out of work. You care about him, don't you? ;)
If you believe these fallacies, God will get you!  :)
Let's add this to the pile of "someone has too much free time on his hands"... along with ASCII art and fake celebrity nudes.
Astounding, profound. Read it again and again after 10 minutes of doing something else until you get it :)
For more information about chancellor Merkel: http://reddit.com/info?id=21466 :-) 
Dupe of http://reddit.com/info?id=2074 posted 5 months ago.
Dupe of http://reddit.com/goto?id=24560 You might want to search before you post.
Man, 20 years olds know everything, and can prove it too.
"Gang of Sharks?"  Where were the Jets? *groan*
whoops. my bad. sorry all!
please don't feed the trolls
Apple will reveal only new Intel machines on Tuesday. No way in hell Mr Jobs will let out any more G4
Windows file protection stops the WMF patch. Here is a free program that will turn of windows file protection for a few while you update.
Clean viruses quickly off your friends PC without spending a dime. This site shows you two proggies that can clean out almost any virus.
Sounds romantic, until the reception falls prey to the /. effect.
It's a colour burn issue. And your eye can perceive segments much smaller than 1/15th of a second. Closer to 1/60 or so.
I wonder if it was a dupe.
This is a basic list of horrible failures in the history of software.  They should update it with the recent Tokyo Stock Exchange bug where the infamous trade cancel didn't work. http://mdn.mainichi-msn.co.jp/business/news/20051212p2g00m0bu028000c.html
Think of them as "classic Joel". I have no problem with them. Anyway you can vote them down if you don't like them.
Although I don't know what a person is *supposed* to do with a live mouse he/she wants out of the house, I'm confident throwing it into a fire while still alive is *not* on the approved list of humane ways to dispose of a mouse.   Go mouse!
Meh. How much would it have cost if we hadn't gone to war, Saddam built his WMDs and then started another war in the Middle East and we had to go down there and sort it out?
I really hate being nickel-and-dimed to death.  Guess I'll have to find out if I can handle an open source OS.  I've been wanting too anyway, but this will be the clincher. I recently reinstalled windows, and it automatically upgraded windows Media Player to version 10.  Version 10 will not play movies unless you buy some "extra" codec thingie.  I'm still looking for a good DVD player software.  VideoLAN is good, but not perfect. Thanks for posting this.
How much money does Bill Gates *need*, anyway?
Oh that reminds me.  I still have a mouse in the freezer.  I should throw it out before anybody opens the bag and finds it's little bugged-eyed frozen corpse.
You're thinking small. Imagine how much it would have cost if Saddam had built a *giant super-robot* and used it to terrorize America? A lot, that's what! And that _totally_ justifies the cost of the Iraq War.
"They're not adding new content, they're just shooting for higher karma, and they're being lazy about it." In order: Yes they are (by definition, because they couldn't post the article if it was already posted); Possibly, but so what?; and no, they aren't -- at least, not any more lazy than most of the people who run across an interesting article and think "hey, this should be on reddit!" IMO, if someone posts an article here (or to any site of this nature) that article should be judged solely on what it has to offer. That's the whole point, isn't it? If you find the article stupid, pointless, redundant, or too similar to something that was just posted, then by all means knock it down. But if you're trying to judge whether the poster's intent was pure enough, or whether he broke enough of a sweat hunting it down, maybe you're going about this the wrong way. Then again, maybe I'm just taking this whole thing way too seriously. 
yeah it's not like Saddam never started a war or anything
Oh I had to give that post a thumbs down ;)
Its hard not to like Boondocks.
If you substitute the word "saleman" for entreprenur, you'll most likely find that these points are obvious.
It sounds like it was written by a kid trying to garner excitement for his new blog so he can make two dollars a month from Adsense. I'm cynical.
The "dead body" was probably a cockroach. I'm very cynical.
I think the trend is clearer if you look at the two years charts at www.alexa.com. Diggit is the younger site who reached nearly the same reach  as slashdot in the last months of 2005. And you can also see that slashdot has a peek in december 2005 after which slashdot come down; but slashdot is clearly above diggit. 
Too bad Mr Crockford himself misunderstands Javascript.  For instance, he has ported lint to Javascript, but his "jslint" will NOT account for the comma operator.  There go my for statements such as for (var i=0, n=arr.length; ....)  See http://www.crockford.com/jslint/lint.html
Umm...just say "no" to Microsoft. Seriously, at the risk of starting a flame war...
A "breaking news" page which will be updated as more info comes in...
From the story: "Unseasonably dry and windy conditions have charred more than 53,000 acres and destroyed 10 homes in southeastern New Mexico in recent weeks." Why would someone start a leaf fire near their house during these conditions? I agree with MamieK: Go mouse!
What about this site :P
"Yeah, Shakespeare, what a moron. He's like dead, you know." If you have have read it 20 times, don't read it another time. Duh. With the bulk of information out there, it's pretty much a given that the bulk of people haven't read anything in particular. And from some articles that make it into here, it also seems to mean it's hard to find good content these days. Pick on the actually bad posts, not the one you dislike for reasons that are fairly local to you...
Interesting, but I can't say I've ever experienced any of these problems, although I typically run with only about 10 tabs open.
Ah, it worked! The relevance of your older post has been increased by this one, pushing the karma of the older post back up to zero (at the the point of writing). Nice :)
This describes me to the t;in the sense that I let go of errands to focus on bigger projects and of course others loathe me, because I delight in what I'm doing while neglecting chores and they hate it and secretly hope and wish I would fail, so they could say how much of a loser I am. But,alas, it's not so. I am simply procrastinating in order to follow my huge dreams. This article was , well perfect!
i was born and raised in finland, but have since become an expat. this man speaks the truth... and made me homesick!
An orgy in economic fallacies. -1
Alexa is hardly a good meter for geek stuff,  it is just an indicator of the penetration of digg and slashdot  among "normal" internet users.
